lol...ingenious.
no, the Brits eat Cadbury
Not to drag this on, but...  &gt;It is deceitful to argue that similar industries should have similar profit margins.  Never did that.  &gt;Do you really expect the same profit margin when selling 8 million Coca Colas or 10 Ferraris?  That was the whole point of comparing ROAs across industry, to illustrate this idea.  And for the record, Ferrari had a profit margin of 15.9% last year while coke operated with an 18.9% profit margin. &gt;Economies of scale will drastically reduce the profit margin of the mass produced product.  Actually, your claim of fundamental flaws applies here.  This quote assumes that ferrari's and coke follow the same economies of scale which implies the same production methods.  You should be comparing different quantities across one product or different products across one quantity, both doesn't work.  (See above profit margins)  I believe you are thinking of diminishing marginal returns, which is not directly related to profit margins.  Also, it depends on whether the economies of scale are increasing, decreasing, or constant (all are possible).   &gt;U.S. gasoline consumption of 320,500,000 gallons per day (March 2005) works out to about 3700 gallons per second. &gt;And you're comparing that to Blackberries?  No, I never compared those figures to Blackberries.  &gt;Profit margin is not the problem here.  I never identified any problem.  I was commenting on the technicalities of using unlevered returns across industries compared to levered returns.  Also, profit margin is not the same as ROA.
Are you allowed to kiss your pussy in public?
&gt; But still, it takes a special kind of imagination to tie cyclist participating in an event trying to raise visibility for bike-friendly issues  They intentionally block traffic with various techniques, until the entire group passes through.   Which is a LONG time.  As I pointed out in another response, if I had a family member who was rushed to a hospital, the last thing I want is to be blocked by a bunch of "Critical Mass" cyclists blocking an intersection from evil "cars".  Save up to see a show?  You're going to miss it.  Have dinner reservations?  They are going to be given away.  That's a really good way to get your message across.  That's worse than car-enduced gridlock ... how does that further the cause of cycling?
February 2008 interview of Obama with  San Antonio Express-News  columnist Carlos Guerra: Guerra then asked, "Have you considered other funding sources, say taxing emerging energy forms, for example, say a penny per kilowatt hour on wind energy?"  Obama replied: "Well, that’s clean energy, and we want to drive down the cost of that, not raise it. We need to give them subsidies so they can start developing that. What we ought to tax is dirty energy, like coal and, to a lesser extent, natural gas." end quote  And that, my friends, is a tax on electricity that isn't supplied by nuclear, wind, or solar sources. 
Right-o. His Cadbury Egg fell from his mouth.
Yes, but their FAQ gives the impression they are merely passing on third-party postage costs to its users. I suppose they could invest the money between when your card gets charged and when they get charged from their postal supplier.  Or am I overthinking this?
I've seen this site before, and the concept is flawed. Not many people are willing to pay to mail their books out.  A better system would be what neighborrow.com uses, which makes use of local trading in your same geographic area.
I don't think that's quite the exact expression.
I have no idea why you got downmodded. Scrivener's a real cool tool. (Maybe people who work for other screenwriting companies are about?)
That doesn't strike you as a nasty hack?
Dammit.. that's genius. Every time I see Chris Angel on TV, I think to myself.. "What a douchebag" but then he does something that makes me watch his show for at least 15 minutes. I gotta hand it to the guy... he's a great showman.
The article calls this "popular" but in my several trips to Japan I have never seen it, never seen a picture of it, and never heard mention of it. So I'm pretty sure it's not popular.
And? Who Doesn't ejaculate in the raid?
Because the only card I need is the ACE OF SPADES!
What state?  I know some in the hick part of Illinois where you can.  It's a blue collar town though, so people bring in their work tools into the bar so they won't be stolen by punk ass teenagers.
Meth?
It looks sort of like a hoodie to me more than a popped collar. I definitely could be wrong. Can anyone have a higher resolution pic?
Upvoted for "Gonads"
Sushi is rice with vinegar, with anything on it. This can include raw fish, cooked fish, cooked egg, vegetables, whatever.
Some things I've gotten from Paperbackswap in recent months:  * [A History of Mathematics](http://www.amazon.com/History-Mathematics-Carl-B-Boyer/dp/0471543977) * [Love All the People](http://www.amazon.com/Love-All-People-Bill-Hicks/dp/1845291115) by Bill Hicks * [The Cassini Division](http://www.amazon.com/Cassini-Division-Fall-Revolution/dp/0812568583) by Ken MacLeod * [The Guns of August](http://www.amazon.com/Guns-August-Barbara-W-Tuchman/dp/0345476093) and [The March of Folly](http://www.amazon.com/March-Folly-~-Troy-Vietnam/dp/0394527771) (in hardcover) by Barbara Tuchman * A large stack of Discworld paperbacks  ...and a hell of a lot of other things. Many of these are things that had been on my wish list, so I got first crack at them when someone listed them. The service is useful beyond what's available at a given moment.
HAHAHAHAHAHAH is that real???
Maybe it's 20/20 hindsight, but I don't think it takes more than one look to figure out which one is soon going to screw over the other.
You never go ass to mouth!
I don't know about you guys, but that was hard for me to see. I lightened the picture up some, so that you guys can see it better: http://tinyurl.com/5fasp7
I wish my parents would stop arguing on internet message boards.
...well at least this lady was somehow aware of her deficiencies and working on it :-)
then there would be one less internet tough guy in the world and teh world would be a better place.
For the record I don't really think so, but it's an interesting read nonetheless
Check out this [cop forum thread](http://theerant.yuku.com/topic/7789/t/Video-shows-NYPD-cop-assaulting-cyclist.html) for his comrades' opinions. Some excerpts:  &gt; Another example of how the city wants you to do nothing and take no action. Let the savages have the run of the place. &gt; they were recklessly speeding by pedestrians (police). the cop was trying to make it to the sidewalk and the guy just couldn't slow down and show a little pedestrian courtesy. filthy animals in manhattan! &gt; Everytime these Democrats take to the street they create a traffic nightmare and safety hazard for all in their path- terrorists on wheels! Enough Already!!!!!!
I bet  there's a NY cop sitting behind a desk who wishes he could be in New Zealand right now.
&gt; "Is it true that after sometime California will slowly slide and break apart from the US?"  No, actually everything east of the San Andreas fault will splash into the Atlantic ocean.
20 years from now 99% of software will be open source in any case. It has simply been demonstrated as the cheapest way to produce high quality software.  Software is the worse possible case you could have brought up. Free software already has immeasurable value to the economy (while still paying programmers thanks to service contracts).
&gt; It's also legal to carry your fists and feet into bars. Those are lethal too, just not at the same range as firearms.   Mr. T's are more deadly then firearms.
I don't think it matter, whether or not he is a clost atheist. What matter is the fact that his ideas and proposed policies are sound and perhaps take first step towards atheists being accepted socially and politically on equal grounds if he got elected. All you american redditors, I'm counting on you guys to redeem USA by voting Obama. I, as an Australian, will just enjoy the show. Though I must say, if senile Mcain get in though, it can't be good for any of us, american or not. 
If we didn't spend as much on our military as every other country in the world combined, we'd have roads as nice as Germany's.
Since no one creates a river, how does one come to own one?  In what way does capitalism hold "integrity and trustworthiness as cardinal virtues"? If a person can gain more wealth by putting aside their integrity, doesn't capitalism reward them for doing so?
Let's play free association:  "Living in Antarctica" --&gt; "Huge Mistake"
That's the name I'd use in a fantasy roleplaying game.
&gt;Do you have profound mental retardation?  That's from playing with lead toys.
Your mom was traced back to 1900 BC
Not here.
Just by reading the title and the 1st sentence, I could tell it was worthless, crappy science journalism, and it was.
Communism will fix that. All hail the glorious community leader Obama!
It says HeavyP(x) -&gt; ExpensiveP(x). It says nothing about ¬HeavyP(x) -&gt; ¬ExpensiveP(x).   Edit: ! changed into ¬
It's from the Monty Python sketch "The World's Funniest Joke", btw.  Full sketch [over here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gvj1QGqfQyg) =)
I took a glance at [realadultsex.com](http://realadultsex.com) and immediately thought "holy tl;dr," and promptly ran away.  Your "people as people" comment is spot on. I'm not a fan of the feminist label, nor the masculist one. I would rather call myself a humanist. I've pretty much always felt that any group that focuses exclusively on aiding one particular clique in society is fundamentally flawed and doomed to become elitist. (However this doesn't mean I think any such group should be done away with, per se.)  I have no qualms with the dictionary-definition goals of feminism, which is simply equality for women. I don't think any woman should ever be exploited by a man. But likewise, turning the tables and going the eye-for-an-eye route isn't the answer. I do have a problem with feminism when it goes beyond just equality and women start to exploit men just because they can. People are people, y'know?  I've kind of learned to view feminism as a religion of sorts. Religion is something people turn to when looking for answers, or for a feeling of salvation from hard times, etc. I'm sure feminism can do a lot of women going through hardship and pain a lot of good. But the path to hell is paved with good intentions.  To give an analogy, I think the main, resonating message of Christianity is to love everyone else and treat them with respect, no matter what they do to you. Yet despite this simple, innocent goal, how many people have been killed in the name of Jesus? The most damning, judgmental people I've encountered fancy themselves as "religious."  Similarly, no one ever has a problem with the simple goal of feminism: equality. But most of the time it's never really about these goals in reality. I honestly believe that a lot of the modern, feminist thought circulating out there is a major contributing factor to the alarming suicide rate in males. When you grow up learning about how everything you do is wrong and oppressive, and how you should feel guilty about it all, is it really that surprising to see why a lot of males will hate themselves enough to actually end their lives?  In a way, feminism and masculism (or "men's rights") seem to me like two different denominations. Both want equity, fairness, etc., but both take it too far sometimes into the realm of slander and hate. Every religion has its extremists.
that's why I picked up an unlimited package.. and I send a WHOLE LOT of text &amp; picture messages. Hey, might as well get my moneys worth.   I have unlimited voice too on all of the phones. I told my fiancee to call everyone she wants whenever she wants, and talk a LOT. Again, might as well use it.  Actually, it's saved us money.. she was already talking like it was unlimited.
"Norton is not worth this much..." the guy probably thought.
Actually, there are 666!  That's the number of comments noted when I added this just to swing the number of comments up to 667.  A number that makes me feel so much better given the subject matter of the story.  Phewwww.
Put behind the desk?!?  I'd pretty much be fired on the spot if I ran down the hall in my office and hockey checked some old lady over her desk...probably even brought up on assault charges.  Why not the people who are allegedly hired to protect and serve the community though. The police are a fucking joke and embarrassment. -A disappointed but not surprised New Yorker (actually I'm more pissed than anything)
Well, for you straight guys the obvious answer is the playboy mansion.
I stand corrected. No wonder I was still hungry.
Oh fucking please, I would LOVE to see all the videos New Yorkers would post of cops breaking the law. The site would be flooded in minutes! This will end in total embarrassment for the NYPD!  
Learning enough latex to write a entry-level paper can be done in an afternoon tbh, thats not too much to ask, considering he can continue use it and expand his skills for a couple of years.  Too bad it isn't used much outside of academia, at least here in Sweden.  Sorry for the lack of apostrophes, broken key :/
Unit Cohesion
You know, not every Brit is like Austin Powers.
Which means that every state would then need to have an FDA, which would mean every state would have to do their own tests, which would mean more taxes.
Please stop submitting this crap.
Are you the guy in the picture?
I always thought Wolf Blitzer would be cool.
Except that Woz apparently doesn't feel like he got screwed - he still shows up at Apple events, for example, and his stock was worth over $100 million at the time of the IPO.  In addition, a lot of people don't know this, but what knocked Woz out of Apple wasn't politics or Jobs, it was a [plane crash](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Steve_Wozniak#Aircraft_accident). It sounds like a freaking soap opera story, but apparently smacking his plane into an embankment messed with his head enough to knock him out of the rat race.  And, I know it's cruel to say, but it might explain why he never designed anything of significance after the Apple II.
I just love to say Wozniak. Wozniak! Wozniak.
I hit reset... you're all better now.
&gt;That's a "trend" imposed from outside, along with somewhat more modern legal systems.  Are you suggesting that since the 600's till 1900, there was never a time and Muslim society where Jizya was not enforced?  &gt;This way it's very hard to point out what is and what is not Islamic. But we consider the Crusades Christian along and the The Hundred Years' War. We consider the Inquisition Christian (as a parenthesis, the Inquisition, in it's mad quest for pseudo-Christians, is obviously inspired by the Muslim obsession with pseudo-Muslims, fake converts trying to escape the humiliation and poverty reserved for dhimmis). Why shouldn't do that with Muslims?  Not we. You.   &gt;&gt;If you look at the sayings of Muhammad (i.e. Hadith), he never placed such a condition, and put high praise on whoever frees a slave.  &gt;Is the Srebrenica massacre Islamic because Muhammad did the same thing to the Banu Qurayza?  I fail to see a point here. Perhaps more of relevance, would you say the Srebrenica massacre is something essentially Serbian? I wouldn't.   &gt;I beg to differ. For all the Muslims in the Ottoman empire, until the raise of Nationalism, the Ottoman Empire was THE Kaliphate. They waged war for it (for example, at the Battle of Varna we have Arabs fighters, including camel cavalry!). They massacred for it (for example the Batak massacre or the genocide of the Armenians, Assyrians and Greeks in the Ottoman Empire by Turks, Kurds and Arabs). Not to mention that Arabs, Kurds, Tatars and even Persians were colonized all over the Balkans as far as Dobruja.  They fought alongside the Turks because the Turks allowed them to rise to high ranks if they did. I don't see how that implies that all the Muslims in Ottoman lands accepted being ruled.  Take the Ibn Saud family. Since the 1700's they'd been fighting on and off with the Ottomans to get control of the land.  Look up Muhammad Ali Pasha. He repeatedly had to quell uprisings against the Turks in Arabia and Egypt.  That there were those who fought with the Turks does not negate the existence of those who fought against them.   &gt;I didn't say "Shariah states it". All I said is "slavery with the only way out being conversion to Islam is compulsion."  Well hey - if you're quoting all these things as stuff Muslims did but not necessarily from Islam, I have few objections or complaints. 
I wouldn't bother. Bandwidth is cheap.
HAHA, EEEWWW. *(waves a flaming torch at you and prods you with a pitchfork)*
How often do you read them twice?  
November is a real...  Doh!
I'm totally unsurprised that you get punched in the crotch 20k times a week. I guess it goes kind of numb after a while, eh?
I know almost every big lawyer in New York, who the hell are you? 
Where is that? All I can find is a regular library.  &lt;/smartass&gt;
Son rejects [parental ideas], supports [something that pisses them off].
An un-maintained 2 year old car could pollute more than an older car that is maintained well, and I agree with Jay Leno. Older cars, especially collector cars, are in great mechanical condition and driven very little.
Yep, I'm also a member of the Illuminati and a reverse-vampire. You've sure got my number.   Christ you're stupid. 
No way.  But, I love it for other reasons...
You are correct, sir.  TY. It's a shame you get downmodded for being helpful.
let the states ban lead in toys.
You really don't understand the difference between "being" as a conjugation "to be" and "being" as part of "human being"? You need a basic linguistics course.
*bang!*
with my seven week training program you can.
KRUD's fault
Fun fact: Bandar in hindi means monkey.
shut the fuck up dude, seriously, no one cares
&gt; "Pro-Life" is a twisted, hateful term. Seriously? What meaning in that phrase is possibly construed as being hateful? If anything, I would think the term "anti-choice" or "anti-abortion" could be considered hateful. As in someone who is "anti-abortion" might be hateful of your choice, your decision, to do what you want with what is yours. One who is "anti-abortion" would be one that might bomb the abortion clinics and other such violence. Those who are "pro-life" perceive life as a beautiful thing, and they wish to put forth policies to protect life. A true "pro-lifer" would not bomb a clinic or injure an abortionist. Though I am pro-life, I understand and respect those who disagree. But please. Do not call "pro-life" hateful and twisted.
In other news, men have been discovered to have been looking at women on the street, so Saudi Arabia has banned eyes please show up at your local hospital for a quick and painless removal.
I'm a hippy chick with crazy hair, and I ride in the middle of the street sometimes because this shithole city I live was designed for horse-and-buggy use, not car use, and there's nowhere else for me to ride because the shoulder is wall-to-wall parked cars.  Also, I don't look down on you when you drive by. I just consider you a dangerous moving obstacle. Unless you feel compelled to shout something asinine out the window as you pass, in which case I *will* try to get ahead of you at the next light and sneer.
you misspelled penises 
Christian reads story about [Religion], states [that he is a persecuted victim].
I'm pretty sure I've seen an animated version of every last one of these creatures in Donkey Kong Country.
Rosie O'Donnell blogged?
&gt;I can't understand how someone could possibly think this is a good idea.  I do know a disturbing number of married couples who play Wow together, and some tiny fraction of them might even try to give their kid a game-themed name, but some of the suggestions the guy listed are so dumb (and listed without any hint of irony) that it's got to be a troll.  Orgrim *Doomhammer*? Leeroy Jenkins?  Why not "Sunwell Trash Run &lt;our last name&gt;"?
At least that has some chocolate content...
And that's twisting words.
Direct mail kicks the ass of online conversions and it's been around for 80 odd years and will still be going strong in another 80 years. 
This goes to show Europe has been desperate to sell off its excess farming products for decades.
the library charges you when you're late.
He can write?!?!
Apparently high school chemistry and biology in the UK is way more kickass than in Canada.  Either that or I was sick when they covered bomb making and biological weapons.
umm, the world's oldest joke is SJP walking into a bar... 
That's what I was trying to do here:  [reddit](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6udva/breaking_mccain_drops_out_due_to_health/)
can anyone explain what the huge pipes going around the system and wrapping towards the magnetic accelerator thing are:) ?
Guess I could just go with the caption that gets the most points.
:)
I'm a California Ron Paul supporter, and I don't trust Obama one bit.  He's just as slimy as McCain if not more so, since he actually knows his shit and isn't senile.
yes - the comments mentioned in the OP were threats of violence against specific people. 
gotcha!
Pretty.
He has a point. Norton is worthless now.
Did anyone else read:  &gt;There are many ways of working the prostate, not simply erection.  ?
That offends me! 
Don't leave out raping and pillaging.  But those years are behind me ... that's more for those regional airline bilge rats.
Marshmallow is animal skin and bone cooked to a gooey consistency and some sugar and flavour. Warm and fuzzy indeed.
So it's legal to own a little bit... But where does that little bit come from?  So the middle class white guy that smokes a joint goes off scott free, but the kid he bought it from would go to jail.  Something doesn't add up here.  Since there will be more demand, if this goes through, who is going to supply it? Who supplies it now? Supplying would still be illegal, so this would cause gang violence to increase and imprisonment of poor (read: black) folk to increase!  Either completely legalize it or completely ban it. This in-between idea is NOT "intelligent."
Women would hate this. You can't cuddle a pair of gonads and have them reassure you that you're pretty and important.
Didn't even read it, make it look better prick
I was thinking more in the broader sense that it's possible to make a career or vocation out of one's knowledge of music. ... But I suppose playing video games would relate to a possible future career making (or reviewing, or, someday, teaching) video games, too.  There is also the idea of high art, of which certain music is certainly a part; I'm talking about experiences such as religious ecstasy, catharsis, healing -- real soul-moving stuff.   I guess I'm thinking in terms of what a person might wish he'd done more of on his deathbed. A good rough simplification might be the difference between expression and escapism.
the surge worked
I'm an Obama supporter.  I have stated multiple times that a person's preferred mythology should be irrelevant as it's unrelated to their job qualifications.  The fact that you haven't seen it doesn't mean it hasn't happened.
Don't bet on it.
perhaps the cops just want to start attacking the people *IN* the videos or come up with some terrorist claim about the people filming. trickle them in first and see how it goes and *THEN* dump the motherload all over their faces.  KOOMFASA!
Banana who?
Let's unify over toleration of criminal leadership.  
I know right?  Every computer geek I know has a box or two of old cables from various equipment.  Saves a buck or two if you need to swap a cable in someone's computer your fixing or such.
Doh. You're right. I'm glad I'm not Catholic--would probably get a serious knuckle-rapping from a Nun for that slip.
Pandemic 2  [Here ya go](http://www.crazymonkeygames.com/jkf6Tr/pandemic2.swf)
I like to pick on Apple because I can purchase computers made by their competitors that meet my needs just as well, if not better, at a several hundred dollar cheaper price.  These several hundred dollars in saved income could then go towards investment, my kids' college tuition, paying my phone bill for several months, a years worth of coffee, a new PDA, etc.  In conclusion, I have no need to throw my money around. If anything, I'd rather use extra money to go travel somewhere.
How did I know blobfish was going to be #1 in the list even before opening the page?
But we're not paying record prices per gallon of Google.
The hypocrisy of all these "Apple Haters" is the real story here. Everyone of them has an old picture of them...wearing some "outfit" that looks equally ridiculous today.  The author on the other hand, should be applauded for his "brilliant and highly original" idea...trying to make fun of Jobs, just to get traffic.  Who'd a thunk it...sic
Well shit - I was going to start using this on the dumbass Americans.  Foiled!  Oh wait - they still think this thing runs on tubes.  Full speed ahead!  Though, I think in America, it shall be a booby on your head, and something that smells like fish in their hand. Damn!  Foiled again!  You Americans - I will get you someday!  Oh yeah, and 419eater.com?  OLD NEWS.  
I will always accept this situation. I like no. 4.
[Sochi](http://www.englishrussia.com/?p=1873). Nice and warm, and since it's not on an open ocean (that's the Black Sea in the photo), there's indeed decent weather and relatively few hurricanes.  But it'll be famous after the olympics in 2014, so get there quick (;
wtf are you talking about?
&gt;funny thing about this, there was a post a few days ago about people naming their kids stuff like Laniqua, and Ta'davius (which I would never do but hey to each his/her own) and everyone was making fun of the names, but somehow this is different and ok. wow.  Uh, who is saying this is different and *ok*?  Are you reading the same thread I am? Seriously, what the hell?
I downmodded you for the sarcasm tag.  It kills the joke.
Anyone else notice how the spread of Wal-Mart stores correlates closely in both time and geography to the spread of the obesity epidemic?
I'm still gonna go ahead and blame former Digg users.
Ahh now the elitist tone. You must be tired from holding out your hand waiting for someone else to fill it with money. Again with the name calling, the sure sign of someone with a weak argument. Nice use of vocabulary but your argument is weak. Who is more philanthropic, the rich or the poor? "The rich have more, Gimme some" is the reflexive rant of someone who  wants much but expends little energy actually getting it on his own.  You may be better educated, but it appears to have been wasted on you..
why is this on reddit again.  the next time i see this image on here will be the last time i use this site.  i give it 3 days.  use the fucking search people.
If I had a collar, I'd pop it just to annoy you.
To be fair, I was very tempted to repeatedly download Metallica's albums, hoping I'd make those whiny bitches cry some more.
Could be brain cancer.  You may have a growing cyst in your head.  Get an MRI fast.  A relative of mine had brain cancer and had the same symptoms.  
#4 is at least partially right, that code shows the serial number for some Nokias
Couldn't figure out how to get it to pull the english version... free comment karma to anyone who can.
A fool's thoughts...
That would be because the union is an evil organization that does everything it can to screw GM out of as much money as possible.
Clearly you heathens have never heard the Bible story about the loaves and the fishes.
I think activated charcoal absorbs flavors instead of releasing them...
My first attempt at the Garfield randomizer turned out [surprisingly awesome](http://i38.tinypic.com/33kpq8j.jpg).
No,it lacks caffeine.
nerds of reddit, not redditors...  non-nerd redditors aren't invited
You're just a nerd, but without the fucking.
Wow. The comments on that almost reach youtube levels of stupidity.
For your future reference, please do not CamelCase the word "douchebag".
I like pancakes
Very True. Also, belief in Science have nothing to do with 'omniscience'. Most of us would agree that science probably isn't capable of knowing everything, because 'everything' invoke infinity.  So we should conversely turn to God, who is deemed omniscience? That's laughable. It's easy to say an imaginary figure, or for the sake of argument a figure who at least refuse to reveal itself,  is 'omniscience'. But the fact remain no god has ever imparted any truth, abosolute or pratical, where as Science has produced many practical truths. 
I feel great about it. I have purchased unlocked phones directly from Motorola, and Cingular was still trying to say that I had to be in a 2yr agreement and agree to a $175 early termination fee if I cancel. Uh, hello, I didn't take any subsidy. I brought my *own phone* to the table.  Fuck early termination fees. Quit peppering people with "free phones" and we won't need them anyway. There are carriers that have NEVER had ETFs, and they're doing great. MetroPCS is an example. Sure, you pay a higher price for the phone, but overall I think that's a good thing. When I worked for AT&amp;T Wireless, I found that people came to expect things. They **expected** free phones, every couple months. They'd use that "Oh, I'll just leave and go to Verizon.. they'll give me a FREE PHONE" as a sort of bargaining chip.  Fuck termination fees. And fuck the customers too.
&gt;cooking, cleaning, and cum disposal.  FTFY
Sure there have always been shallow scenesters, but historically they have co-existed with serious ones. Now, what's a "serious" hipster? There's no such thing, like the article suggests, there's no cause and nothing is being rebelled against ...
Uh.. yeah it's a big company. So what?
&gt; *"Do Representatives swear to unite the country or do they swear to uphold the Constitution?"*  When they say 'Unite the Country', what they mean is uniting it back under the same fraudulent system of Government once again.
Uh, sarcasm... I attack both sides, because, and I know this for a fact, no one shares my opinions. To quote Patton Oswalt: "We need all these 50's War Mongering A**holes, and all these 60's tambourine banging, no bathing hippies to die. And we need Conservatives who can accept gays, and liberals who shave and bathe. That's what will make the world a better place" Hippie.
Trust fund babies pretending to be something they're not. In the twenties they called it "slumming". In the '90s you'd see these same idiots drive up to the food stamp office in their landrovers. They will all graduate with a meaningless degree in bull-shit and go on to middle management mediocrity. And half of them are LUGs, "liberal until graduation". http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ONEYGU_7EqU
Looks like paperbackswap.com to me.
How utterly trite.  To even compare China to North Korea shows a surprising ignorance of Asia and its various countries.
[Almost!](http://www.westegg.com/inflation/infl.cgi)
Chuck Norris' feet make guns cower in the corner.
It doesn't matter whether it's a requirement or not if, as is the case here, the hosts lie to the IOC and say "there won't be", then retract that false promise at the last minute.  Then again, if the IOC didn't see *that* coming...
That's nothing. I can use solar energy to turn it into cheese.
Nope; sorry. The writing is crappy anyways.  It's creative writing intro 101 material. We get it; you're snarky. Move along.  Anyways, it's about implausible as a H.R. Thompson book; except we all knew Thompson was making shit up for sure.
Well, that's pretty much in line with what I was saying. You're driving a car that's at least 27 years old, and it's a one-off. Unique. I think it's great you're doing so, but most people aren't going to go this route. They want newer cars, with dealers and factory warranties.   So far, as I said, the Prius and Civic hybrid fit this bill (they even have heaters and A/C!)but no plug-in electric.  I'd buy ANY kind of 4WD pickup truck, gas, diesel, hybrid, electric, hydrogen or whatever, which could carry 1000lbs cargo, seat four, get 35+mpg and get serviced by people nearby. But such a thing does not exist for sale in the USA.
[jodhpurs](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jodhpurs) are those crazy hot pants she's wearing :-)
No, it cuts the price by 50%.
Downmodded for visitng reddit too much.
Apologies if I came off harsh.  Re-reading some of my posts, I can see I was overly abrasive.  You're right, I haven't seen anything with my own eyes to support the theory that we have been visited by aliens.  Despite the artifacts, photos, eyewitness accounts and everything else, I still haven't seen any evidence or facts that can stand up to scrutiny. That's the difference with the dinosaur comparison - we have cataloged a massive amount of fossils that can be verified by carbon dating and cross-examined with similar fossils of other species.  We have definable and repeatable standards for geological tests.  There is virtually no subjectivity in the results. We have verified proof of the existence of dinosaurs - no such testing or evidence exists that support alien visitation.  I don't seem to be familiar with the vast amount of proof from the ancient world of alien interaction that you are.  All I have seen are a very small handful of samples in either stone, drawings, writings or artwork, and in each of those cases there are questions of authenticity and interpretation.  I don't see the massive evidence of alien interaction, just a few items that (understandably) have lost their native meanings over the millenia. 
America: FUCKING FAT!
Would salmon tell me what's going on?
Smugisfaction(TM) with extra cheese, please.
No. Every encounter I've had with the police has been negative, the worst being the time I called them after my house was burglarized.
A couple of years ago my family hosted a Russian exchange student. Her favorite thing to do was go to Wal-Mart. Once I was there with her and her friends and they just wandered up and down every aisle. Some of the stuff you see when you do that amassed me, even though I was a local.
As an aside:  I have boxes and boxes of random cables specifically because I don't throw them away, buy on-line in bulk when I need something and try to recover whatever I can before scrapping anything, yet I still have family members who will wander down to PC world and pay £12.99 for a USB cable.  Sometimes I could cry... 
I was talking about when people have trouble with billing, it is usually their own fault.  Regarding waiting 6 hours, sure you have a point. If the screen shot isn't doctored, then yes someone or something goofed.  I was just relating my experience that I've used sprint web chat several (numerous, even?) times, and I have had nothing but good experiences with it.  I'm betting that what happened was just a hiccup in the system where had the user just closed the window and opened a new one it would have worked fine.
Yeah, and not only that, the same group released thousands of gallons of aerosoled anthrax into Tokyo, and they only figured out it happened after looking at the group's own records.
The best comparison I can think of for this situation is this:  Imagine two men are in a disagreement, and one of them punches the other one in the face.  If the other one punches him back, obviously this wouldn't be considered 'a right' necessarily, but hardly anyone would actually fault him for this action either.  Also, the moment that the first man threw the first punch, he automatically rescinded any right that he would normally have to 'be outraged' if he gets punched in return.  So I guess the main point of what I'm saying is that while neither individual is technically doing the 'right thing', the responsibility and blame for the violence rests solely on the first man.  Someone can hardly be blamed for responding when attacked, just like the christians can't complain (or play the victim card) if someone turns around and responds in kind to their neverending abuses.
Someone forgot to tell them that 4chan is back up again.
They fight crime.
I knew this was going to be epic from within the first five seconds.
I read the site and thought it was a good idea. I then imagined giving one of my books away to get a new one and said to myself "hell no, I want to keep my books"
**[They are both amateurs](http://www.costumes.org/history/renaissance/norris/Plate%20XXXVIII%20-%20Queen%20Elizabeth%20-%201588%20-.JPG)**
What do you think caused the end of war, violence and poverty? The whites exterminated everyone else.  Actually, I seem to remember that that was part of the theme of *Lathe of Heaven*.
"ADONISYS ERROR: Cannot Load A Required Template, [], for /home/marinersoftware/www/eventview.php [ contact webmaster@marinersoftware.com ]"  Doesn't seem to work on my Mac...
Yeah I couldn't make it through the first fifteen either.  It was talked up a bit too on reddit, but I just could not get into it.
It's good to hear Congress is focusing on the important issues.
What did I say it would take?  30 days before the story on the spying fully played out.  A lot of people will probably say this is a "race issue" down ticking.  But the problem is that Obama was sending out Nazi-like totalitarian communist e-mails to justify spying on people without probable cause and none of us were buying it and we were among his biggest supporters.  Frankly, I'm thrilled to see this downticking because it means the influence of the Internet on politics is substantially increasing.  We would have had Obama's back on the race issues ... that is until he became fascist.  Obama never "moved to the center" ... he just became move of a fascist, and frankly, the Internet is pretty much done with fascist politicians, be they black, or be they white.
- あまりよく知らないが、インドでは吹替が常識だと聞いたことがあるのだけど(地域ごとに言語が異なるので、インド映画でも吹替ないと上映できない)。そのわりに彼らは英語をよくしゃべる(彼らの英語は日本人には何を言っているかわからないぐらいクセが強いが)。 - まあインドの公用語のひとつは英語だけど - 文学・文芸の世界では日本ほど翻訳が進んでいる国はないという。ふつうの国というのは原語で読むか、せいぜい英語に訳されるのを読むか、というくらい。その辺にいる人が趣味で外国文学を読んでるのは日本ぐらいだそうだ。これは素晴しいことだと思う - ただ、日本人の英語に対する、ある種の「拒否反応」は確かに異常ですらあるように思える
No.
Oh lighten up. My heart really goes out to retards but it's not all PC bullshit. What's your idea of humor? Family Circus cartoons? Some of the best humor comes from alienating other people, it's just how it is. And how does saying christians are dumb = picking on retards is okay? Are you saying it's not okay to pick on christians because they are retarded?? My god, get a job spinning stories for fox news. Christians aren't dumb because they lack intelligence, they are dumb because they are  ignorant and blindly believe in something so obviously bogus. 
Politics subreddit.
Read a physical book?
They only got elected for their stance with Israel? I think the fact that they do things like build schools and hospitals was very important too.  They were already doing a lot of the work that people expected from the PA... why not kick out the losers and actually put in the people that provide social services?  Are you Palestinian?  That would surprise me a lot (having known some myself).  You don't dispute my characterization of the Hamas attitude towards (the large numbers of) Palestinians of different religious hues?
When I did one, I just copy-pasted the guy-above-me's and rewrote it. If I were that interested I have a folder that can be opened directly from my taskbar (I've no idea what the terminology for one of those is) where I would keep something like that.
Point of order, this belongs in the Bacon subreddit.
Yeah, he should name him Arthas. Arthas loved his father so much!  (I assume that's the same Arthas as in Warcraft III - never played WoW)
*PLEASE NOTE NOTHING NEGATIVE IS SAID IN THE WORDS BELOW*  Funny - I don't see very many atheist orgs providing food/shelter when disaster strikes.  http://www.namb.net/site/c.9qKILUOzEpH/b.224451/  008 Fleet Report  Kitchens                 117 Recovery (Chainsaw, Mudout, Rebuild, Roofing)  659 Command  8 Communication  18 Command and Communication Combined  13 Chaplain  20 Child Care  23 Shower  77 Laundry  19 Shower and Laundry Combined  47 Water (Purification, Bladder, Tanker)  37 Generator  61 Heavy Equipment (Back Hoe, Cherry Picker, Tractor, Forklift, Pallet Jack, Skid Steer)  57  Trailers (Utility, Dry Box, Refrigerated, Flat Bed, Volunteer Shelter)  158 Motor Vehicles (ATV, Bucket Truck, Box Truck, Dump Truck, Pickup Truck, Passenger Van, Road Tractor, RV, Utility Vehicle, Transport Vehicle)  137 Support  15 Miscellaneous (Medical, Dental, Light Tower, etc.)   37   Total Units                1503
He should off course be fired.  The question is, should he be locked up?  If YOU did any of this, not being a cop, they would lock you up. 
...and no high fructose corn syrup
I bet I could see this meme in Reddit comments 100 times this week.
Interesting the way you avoided mentioning the violent alien races that are stereotypically white - the Cardassians and the Romulans, to name two.
this is not a fair post.  The man's not really a preacher.  He's an alien  - you can tell by how long his neck is.
You're really reaching for those puns, guys... Still, gotta hand it to her, she's armed with a sweet smile, and a big career could be within her grasp. Let's all give her a big hand!
I pretty much notice that when I get downmodded into oblivion, I have just posted some profound truth that many people find hard to deal with.  Have no fear. The social web is an imaginary limbo we can share that has no impact on the real world.
Yeah I did see that, good luck with the programming, if you are the same guy who was talking about implementing  it? This is getting confusing!   PS: I was the one with the "100 cuil puns", I brag a lot when I'm behind the anonymity of a cursor.
Get better eyes.
Is that 2 face, if not how come the left side of his face doesn't seem to match the right side?
Well one could say that if one doesn't at least follow the spirit of the Christian Bible then one isn't a Christian.  Kind of like an atheist believing in God.
I'm gonna have to go with Val Kilmer in the underwater bar fight scene: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GR4NOvaFIOY  Top Secret is an awesome movie
Now tell me about these moving pictures...
How about arresting ALL people holding less than a hundred grams?
We have it memorized.
Down modded for being another ignorant user who doesn't know what Cracked magazine is.  Hint: It ain't about journalism.
Surely that's superior to plain old OO programming.
Of course the chief of police would say some thing like that. Cops protect their own. 
It's not a new idea though. My favorite implementation of inline commenting that I have used is the Django Book. Really sweet and even better once you look at the HTML source. And it pre-dates Code Chat by a year.  http://www.djangobook.com/en/1.0/chapter01/
But what about the [Us Festival](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/US_Festival)?
Funny thing is, if you don't go through with it (and you probably wont) the U.S. probably wont regain the trust and admiration it once had abroad, if you do your internal political machine is screwed (for both parties), a good thing in some ways, but I'd have to see an America as politically unstable as Italy... 
I know right!?  My family does that too and I'm like "Hey, free cable right here.  No need to get screwed on the price"
I live by   *Give a man a fire and he'll be warm for the day.*  *Set a man on fire and he'll be warm for the rest of his life.*
They had to pay a tax, oh the humanity!  Islam and Judaism have a long history of co-existence which is being forgotten by all sides of these current conflicts.
This witty retort came before this [identical witty retort](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6udiw/theyre_youngpic/c04w387) by my reckoning. Although arguably both daggity and Isvara are copying someone else, I think daggity's current score of -2 versus Isvara's +3 is a little unfair.
Incorrect.  It is a further indication that those that seek positions of power of any sort are not to be trusted.
In theory the psych testing will prevent people with a tendency to behead strangers from acquiring firearms.
There was a girl in my school called Nadia. Nads for short. Yeh, it was fun whenever she did sport.
I actually used that phrase with my English teacher.  We were having a discussion on digital books, and she took that phrase as sexual innuendo.  Fortunately, I was able to show her grep on Macbook, and so escaped detention.  Of course, now I can drop all sorts of things around her, and she'll assume I mean something legitimate.
See, this is exactly the reason why I go to the comment section first of these ambiguously named nsfw links. Thank you.
I love this "Cheech and Chong" food...  Cheech: Hey man, you know what would be good to eat man???  Chong: What man?  Cheech: A sausage on a stick man.  Chong: Yeah man, hey maybe with a pancake around it man.  Cheech: Yeah man, you know what would be cool man?  Chong: What man?  Cheech: If the pancake had chocolate chips in it man.  Chong: I gotta right this down man.  Cheech: Pass the bong man...
&lt;eyes rolling up into my head&gt;WOW!  You must be some sort of Internet genius to get that.  I mean, wow!&lt;/eyes rolling up into my head&gt;
Arbitration Agreement - Accounts (free form to download and use). This website saved me. I was able to download this form, edit it and use it in an important matter. There are hundreds of more forms available, so check it out.
I have seen The Machinist, actually.  I was impressed, especially by his dedication (the man was a skeleton, for christ's sake!).  He certainly isn't a hack, but I think Depp is one of the best actors still around.
Even though I had an idea of who Reese was in the movie, I still had to look up Joshua Harto. He's still that guy who wanted to reveal Batman in Dark Knight to most people.
But who perfected it?
beavis and butthead aren't art....  ....they're documentary
Exactly.  When you tell a person that a band sucks, that person is a little more tempted to go find out on their own.
How fucking small is walmart that you don't know the correct name by now?!
Funny, I hadn't noticed that -- and that's really my second beef about Cuil: the interface. Yes it's different from Google, but if Cuil wants users to use it more than once in a while for a joke the interface has to be *good*. And the one they're going with right now just isn't.
So I guess he will have a Horde name then.
Yes, that was me! Though I have nothing to do with programming Firefly - it was purely a "That'd be an interesting project to try some time..." type musing.  After being in there so long, I almost feel like you can see my cursor moving now. Now I know how the people leaving "Big Brother" must feel, when they feel watched...
I bet I can scambait 100 Nigerians.
Why does anyone need that?  When was the last time you applied for a job and had to prove that you graduated high school?  
I feel fat and sassy.
I was in Sears - tool section - on the Black Friday sale weekend this year, when they announced there would be a free giveaway over by the flashing light. I was right next to it. I waited around for 10-15 minutes, thinking it was probably a scam of some kind, and finally some lady came by, and did a small presentation to about 10 of us, for the Shamwow. The free giveaway at the end was a small square of Shamwow stapled to a card, about 5"x8" or so. Then we were offered an amazing price on their limited supply that she had with her. Only $20 for 2 Shamwows, and a mop!  I was the only one not suckered into buying one. I got a real taste of the American populace in that half-hour presentation. They were like puppies, completely excited to be in the presence of this thing, hanging on her every word, nodding energetically to each other, and muttering praises back and forth as she continually spilled things, and wiped them back up. It was kind of creepy. Throughout the whole thing, nothing applied to me "Clean up after pets!" I don't have any pets. "Nasty soda spills?" In 6 years, I don't think I've spilled anything - I have an "uncap, pour, recap, put down" method that just works. "Gets liquid out of carpets!" I have 100% wood floors, and haven't spilled anything on them. "They help in the kitchen!" I don't cook, ever. It was like they designed it specifically to not help me in any way.  I only hung around for the entire show because damn, she was *hot*, and I was standing next to her the whole time.
1: email  2: email  3: email  4: email
Ecofriend: Zero Original Content Since 2005.
OK. TFA makes it sound like it was as random for the attacker as for the dead man. "Terror attacks" are "senseless, random" to the victim, but carefully planned by the aggressor - right?
My penis is in Steve Jobs' pocket! I'm so cool!
"Treason / Apostacy"  This counts as mischeif? According to what, Hadith? The problem is you are ignorant of the way the Quran directs rulings. Look at ANY verse discussing apostasy; you will find, actually, that God says their punishment is in the hereafter. Nowhere in ANY of the verses relating to apostasy does it clear the death penalty.   To prove my point further: During the time of Muhammed, there was a time when Muslim women were being harrassed by other men. The Quran gives a warning to those men, and says if they do not stop, then they could be issued the death penalty. The reason why this can count as "creating mischeif" is because adjacent to these verses are rulings of the death penalty. You will find no such thing near apostasy.  
I hope those black kids went ghetto on that asshole.
i'm surprised that in your country, where guns are commonplace, no one shoots cops who do this.  Anyone witnessing this beating would have been quite justified in opening fire on the baton-wielding cop.
I just think it's funny that ClockRadio is obviously trolling, and that ObviousTroll is the one being serious.
Oops. Will delete.  Just woke up and someone IMed me the story and I figured I'd post it.
as an occasional heroin uses, i am up in arms about the illegality of heroin.   
Try it sometime.
Oh that's how so many things on them have the words "delicious" written on them when in fact they are not delicious at all!
What could he possibly gain from lying?  I mean, besides the five hundred bucks per reprint.
Yes it is.
New Zealand: gun ownership rates as high as the US, but hardly any gun crime. 
Healthy programmers don't use computers. They do all their coding on paper thats hand made from fallen tree branches they collected while biking to work in Palo Alto.  Now who wants a delicious breakfast of fair trade coffee and Kashi?
  These two are probably more relevant to programming on the subject of interruptions and concentration: [Disconnecting Distraction](http://www.paulgraham.com/distraction.html)  [Holding a program in one's head](http://www.paulgraham.com/head.html)
I don't know, Nokia bundles one with everything, I have at least ten chargers lying around the house (and they're all compatible with all the phones they produce).
Didn't know about Clusty. Looks decent.
haha, those scientologists and their law suits.
A whore-se is a whore-se, of course of course!
Pedophile. 
I like how the majority of the article is spent correcting a lot of the phrases that the author mistranslated. 
They ride around in a black van, fighting crime.
The title of two of the links about other README files is "Best README file ever"; and apparently this one is also the most interesting README file ever.  I propose the authors of the three pages fight a duel to the death to determine which deserves the title of *best ever*.
The saudi's are taking over the 'merican way.
They don't give a fuck about the art.  How much do you think an artist actually seems from a CD that's purchased?  This has nothing to do with the RIAA/MPAA protecting the artists/directors/producers/actors... it has everything to do with making sure that the labels and studios get their cut.
Damn that's awesome. :D
To be fair, it depends on the girl :)
**OPEN SESAME**
I would like to see a similar chart with Bill Clinton's tax changes.  Sure the VERY rich peoples' taxes went up a little, but their stock holdings tripled under Clinton.  Bush cut their taxes but their stocks are down over the last 8 years.  Even the top 1% should be for the Democrat in the race.
Oh sure, it's starts with things like 'insurance' and 'banking', but then, before you know it... you've had to treat them as equal citizens (and even let them vote).  *shudder*  What's the problem here?
Oh hell yeah! 
What a pathetic lying douche. 
A situation in which Geek Squad's actions are actually conscionable (sort of).
&gt; "Fake breasts have become inescapable. But I think the main reason why women do it is to please men. They're trying to fulfil a male fantasy, and I don't think we can blame them for this. It might make them feel more confident – but it is ultimately for men." -- Marcelle D'Argy Smith  Sorry, it's what women think men want. Not the same.  Like men, women want to feel desired. The shortcut to this is to attempt to look like desirable women and follow stereotypes.  The trouble is that desires vary so much from guy to guy. Some guys really are all about cup size. To the exclusion of all else. They're...kinda freaky. But hey. There you go.  I think the best rule is probably "learn how to be attractive to the people you find attractive, not the people you want to want you."  In general:  * Have manners * Act classy - but don't mistake classy for stick-in-the-mud * Take care of yourself * Be interesting  Those are the big things I care about, at least, and most of my friends seem to. Maybe you'll find different with others, but...remember it's better to be admired than just desired (a lot of teenagers don't know the difference, and it gets them into trouble).  Want to do something nice for your boyfriend? Loosen up about sex. Dear lord, the sex stuff girls will complain about to their friends but never tell their boyfriend about is truly astounding.  Already okay with sex and want to do something nice? Work on your hand strength for a good massage - a lot of girls will want to be massaged for hours and will repay you with about 30 seconds of halfhearted effort. We like them just as much as you do.  ...that and learn how to give a great blowjob. Because damn. (hint: if he says that he doesn't really like blowjobs, he's probably trying not to hurt your feelings. It's stupid. It's a guy thing)  All of that stuff would be far, far better than bigger tits. At least for me.  Oh, that stuff requires effort, change, and making yourself vulnerable[*]? Can't be bought with cash? Yeah, I can see how implants would be a good idea.  [*] - I dated a girl for a while who had no idea how to give a blowjob. My best friend dated a guy who was clueless about fingering girls. My first girlfriend taught me how to kiss and provided me with plenty of practice. I can't thank her enough for putting up with hours of horrible kissing. It's embarrassing being bad at something like that, and it's really so much easier to just clam up and not change. I get it. I do. I think this is where a lot of the "buying yourself different" stuff comes from. Well, that or never being able to acknowledge your strengths.
Okay, Shower, shower.
I think he means mission-critical, life-or-death, certified stuff.  E.g., it's my understanding that the FAA (U.S. aviation regulators) only allow C and Ada for code that runs the avionics, etc. But, Python is great for proof-of-concepting this code, which can then be migrated module by module to C or Ada.
(Not this again...)  Why would anyone start a specifically atheist charity when so many non-religious charities are doing such a good job? Perhaps atheists don't feel the propagation of their beliefs (or lack thereof, really) is worth alienating those who think differently.  (Edit: clarified a rough bit)
Hey, it might be creating ditches to bury sewer line in...
I'm sure that is the case either way, but that only reinforced my point. Less oil for more money is preferable. 
I would like to see the description, comments, and no video... that way I can get enough data to search for it elsewhere. 
I bet she'd give the other one to be ambidextrous. 
You know, I hadn't even considered that until you brought it up. Fascinating! It could be fixed, perhaps, by allowing users to go negative (say by only one book), but that might be a terrible idea...
and then there is me, i am angry regardless.
I like the Lil' Wayne "Drought 3" approach best.  &gt;This is Da Drought 3. Hope you got this shit for free. If you didn't you're a stupid mothafucka
I think it only applies to law enforcement.
So we are supposed to believ the rantings of an accredited flight engineer? He goes a long way to prove that he is considered legitimate, yet he types like a lunatic. I call hoax, not on the supposed flight engineer, but on the person pretending to post as him. Either that or the very smart engineer is also very crazy.
It's the kind of idea a teenager would find cool.
That's for sure.
Was DHMO found in their blood stream when they overdosed?  DHMO is a dangerous chemical, gaseous DHMO can cause severe burns.  Even small amounts of inhaled DHMO can be fatal!  Ban DHMO Now!!!  After all DHMO is a chemical used in conjunction with drug paraphernalia to increase the effect of smoking marijuana.  http://www.dhmo.org/
You know... Google is a massive company, with billions in resources.  Yet they are hailed for being "cool".  I wonder how many would applaud if it were Microsoft who was doing this?
Do want syrup.
[yes, you did](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MzOpjBOzMqA)
I will laugh my Arse off if its true.
My high school Italian teacher was naming her kid Balthazar.  We made her cry over it.
I'll join your club if we can name it "Play it ONCE, Sam."
Why so? Have you ever lived in either?
INSIDE JOB
My understanding was there were plenty of guns on buses: going to the shooting range for fun, and not at a high enough state of readiness to be used as anything but a club in this case.
*sigh* a semi nice thread of beautiful women gets unsexed by racism...
Locks that the TSA cannot easily open will be broken.  http://www.tsa.gov/travelers/airtravel/assistant/locks.shtm
cheaper != better value
You must not have seen movies or television or advertisements from the late 70's / early 80's.  
No, smear and fear is all he has.
Wow. I wish there was a way to un-delete comments.
a very sad state of reality.
I think Hersh is the one who has been successful at stopping the war.  He lets people know what plans are before they get executed.  It makes it MUCH harder to "surprise" us.
"she's armed with a sweet smile" No, she was disarmed at birth. 
On the other hand, hammering a nail through a piece of dried bread isn't at all as bad as denying basic human rights to a group of people.
I read on ESPN that the white sox want him to play center field. A 38 year old center fielder? Doesn't seem like a wise choice to me.
What a pity he never talked so plainly while he was steering the USA into bankruptcy.
I bet I could see 100 memes.
&gt;  3, probably good advice, but test it out to make sure that's what she wants; some girls don't like it actually.  Some guys must be doing it wrong, then.
*drool*
There are more good people than bad; more people want to get along rather than cause trouble.  A person capable of this probably just snapped at a hard time in his life.  If there was at least one other "good" person on the bus, with a gun, the victim might be alive.  And the perpetrator would be dead and not in the penal system, costing government money, and the time and efforts of many jailers.   There should obviously be fewer laws and more individual freedom.  The right to bear arms, defend yourself, defend the country, and possibly, on rare occasion, defend yourself from the govenment, is an important freedom to have to sustain liberty and happiness.   Add to that, criminals have easy access to guns in many ways, and can often buy at gun shows or through mail order catalogs.  This guy, apparently sociable for the majority of his life, just snapped.  Along with likely suffering severe short-onset acute psychosis, he wanted to create a shock, be famous, and choose to affect people negatively.  He wanted, in the final moment of his apparently painful and diseased life, to destroy and punish.
I'm merely asserting that the average person has no greater evidentiary basis to believe evolution than creationism.  If you've got a problem with that assertion maybe you should actually respond to what I said rather than what you wanted to read.  Edit: and if making reasonable arguments qualifies as fucking with you maybe you should reconsider your claim to the honorable classification of "scientist."
It's closed.
I would have cared more if it didn't come out that there was media/Hollywood backing of this guy.
I hate fox news  Its all about the hemp folks!  
*Don't ruin your son's life &lt;ourlastname&gt;*
Heh, some good stuff here:  http://everything2.com/e2node/catting%2520weird%2520things%2520to%2520%252Fdev%252Faudio
Another series of photos where I think "Why the hell are you taking pictures and not helping?"
I would like to pass a sheet of glass through Criss Angels face
Maybe they could get Marines to fire on Navy ships . . .   Nah, because that would be stupid.  In fact, I'm pretty sure Navy Seals would say "Uh . . . No.  We don't shoot at our own boats. First thing you learn in the the US Navy . . . do not shoot your own people."  Since cheney wasn't in the military, he didn't get the message.
OMG did you see Woz's belt buckle?  ME WANTY
I saw it happen once while I worked for Best Buy and once when I worked for CompUSA.  In both cases, a woman over 50 was approached by one of our female sales staff, and she asked straight out to be helped by a male.  You have to wonder what a woman must think about herself if she's not willing to be helped by another woman.  Understandably it upset my two co-workers, and I tried to explain it away as generational thinking - these women were both raised in a world where there was mans work and womens work (to a large degree, not totally - I know).  Anyway, in both cases I explained to the customers that the women I worked with knew what they were doing.  I made sure to keep my co-workers involved in the sale to show these customers that they did in fact know their stuff.  I also gave both sales to my friends - no way I wanted to profit from that bullshit.  I was tempted in both cases to ask them "Don't you need your husband's permission to spend this much money?".  Not worth getting my ass chewed though.
It's all down to one state's attorney general refusing to even consider a r18 rating. According to the constitution all Attorney General's need to agree, and the South Australian one refuses.  
The major finding here is the development of an electricity-assisted catalyst that cleaves water into hydrogen and oxygen.  Based on this article, which is light on the science, how much reduction in electricity remains unquantified.  At first, I was like...  * We can use electricity to make H20 into H2 and O2... so? * We can slap a photovoltaic on top to generate that electricity from non-fossil sources... so? * We have developed a catalyst that can do this... oh, but the catalyst uses electricity.
I don't see the Israeli army purposefully trying to blow up civilians. There is no clear side of "oppressor" and "victim" in this conflict. I do however give the Israeli's the benefit of the doubt because they don't try to maximize civilian casualties, they try to minimize them. Look at Sderot, they have rockets landing there every fifteen seconds (I believe it was an article on reddit detailing this). The Israeli's do nothing of the sort. 
Regrettably, [we've had our own share of Taser abuse](http://www.cbc.ca/news/background/tasers). Per capita, we've probably had more fatalities than the US, actually.
So he finally pushed someone the wrong way.  If anyone has ever caught his show.  He is the most bigoted people I have ever heard.  And you think O'Reilly is bad.  Check out this guy.  O'Reilly isn't as bad, just more popular.  Savage is off his rocker.  Hates pretty much everyone.  I can't tell if he always just joking or insane.  Gays, people from SF, anyone.  Can't stand Pelosi.  Even though he has Jewish roots?  Was he anti jew as well?  Don't mess with people's kids apparently.
Why the down votes?  Who's denying that Karadžić was consumed by hatred of Muslims and killed thousands and thousands of them?  [He even had death camps]
i've always preferred dan savage 
I see. But that's ok, because it takes for humor to evolve, just like with everything else.
I've got one ugly compact word for you. Nickelback.
Actually, the photo in this link:  http://www.war-line.org/img/Images/Gotcha/showingassets.JPG  constitutes distributing porn without having actor permission or a 2257 on file.  That's a federal offense, son.
Hahaha. Definitely.
So vote for Obama and hope for change on your dollar -- and reparations, and far-left policies with attachments to Ayers. History sucks because it repeats itself.
Oh sweet jesus that would taste like shit.
Peak oil - if real - dictates that alternative energy must be ramped up **fast**
Weird, it's almost like these things are somehow correlated to population density or something.
Yeah, because it is so easy to get hard evidence on people who will NOT testify under oath for any reason about anything.  I think, given that, we have to figure they are lying about a hell of a lot of shit.
Rule 34 -- Now In Effect
Why is this crotch frowning?
I have a problem with anyone trying to deny someone's affiliation based on actions rather than proclaimed belief.  If theists can disown someone based on behavior, then I say atheists, who understand there is no afterlife and you must make the best of this life through moral behavior, can do the same.  
That was the exact thread that came to mind when I read the title. 
aha! Thanks.
What I though he was doing was replying to a comment about generic, pre-fab obvious-subject-matter repetitive songs with a generic, pre-fab obvious-subject-matter repetitive comment. Could just be me.
Horribly unfunny.
well, apparently a lot of people still die from prescription drugs, directly and indirectly
Let that be a lesson to us all: don't wantonly abuse your power until you've been on the force long enough to have buddies who will protect you.
How do you say OH SHI- in Zimbabwean?
A corndog is a hot dog (sausage) wrapped in cornbread batter (pancake batter) on a stick.
But hey, plenty for [kobol](http://www.cuil.com/search?q=kobol&amp;sl=long) and [kobolds](http://www.cuil.com/search?q=kobolds&amp;sl=long)!
Um, the Apple I and Apple II were 70s. Steve was way ahead of the curve here.
I don't know, but can you upload the second song in this mix, it starts at 45 seconds, it's awesome!
Most police conflicts happen in/on public property, therefore it is completely within the law to use a camera. While I think in the extreme hypothetical case you cited the judge would rule with the cops, remember, squad cars have cameras for this exact reason. This would render you needing the spymobile useless.
I see the fox--where are the hounds?
Duh, it must have been a lolcat.  "I CAN HAS VICTOREEZ?"  "Gah, the stupidity! My nazi-dino-brain can't handle this!" *boom*
That is a lot of toxic waste.  I would rather use hydrogen.
IOW - words are more important that actions to you.  That is fucked up.
that lard marketing logo and typography at the bottom right is really nice. Looks like something that someone would produce today.   edit:  maybe it was made 'today' and I am an idiot.
Captain Placeholder &lt;our last name&gt;
1. If you want to recompile the app, yes.  However, users don't need QT on their systems.  2. Don't be.  If Nokia does something fishy, the current codebase is under the GPL and as such can be forked for freedom.
Thanks. I figured that out about 9 months ago.  LULz!
photoshopped all to hell.  sorry, i like it when people look like they have... skin.
as will you.
Just because someone *calls* themself something doesn't make it true...Personally, I don't really think that anyone that doesn't *at least* follow the new testament is a christian at all.  I can go around calling myself a vegan because I only eat meat every *two* days, but that doesn't mean I actually am a vegan.
And judging by the many examples of "enhanced" breasts, it's a terribly difficult and sometimes impossible point to reach.
Well no, as "intelligent commentator" is stretching it a bit.  As for the issue of god, I realize that the burden of proof is on the Muslims for making such a claim. Thing is, they have proof!  You see, it says so in the Qu'ran. Straight from the horse's mouth, so to speak. If god was a horse.
Link to the actual news:  http://news.yahoo.com/nphotos/Dogs-Work-And-Play-Riyadh2C-Saudi-Arabia/ss/events/lf/082503dogs/im:/080731/481/4ae077b661ed4ccd942650a049b8dff5/
Your solution doesn't compare hands of the same type, it just identifies hands by type. Can you improve it to also extract comparison keys for comparing hands of the same type?
I actually thought the hosts of The View asked her some very pointed questions about impeachment.  It was frustrating to hear her completely dodge them, instead talking about 'Equal Opportunity for Equal Pay' and the safety of children's toys.   It was a pathetically transparent attempt to pander to what a largely female audience would probably like to hear.  
The Constitution's 10th Amendment gives those powers to the states and the people.  It's very specific in this instance.  I vote State's rights.
"What's a 'memoir'? Is that German or something? You ever noticed how men grow hair on their faces and women don't? Maybe they just shave better. Shaving foam doesn't taste good." - By George W. Bush. Written in crayon.
How do you know what my principles are? If one were to come to any conclusions about what my principles are from my statements in this thread i would imagine that they would conclude something like:  This guy believes people should be able to say whatever the fuck they want without any sort of prior restraint.  So, how would that create Irony by me saying "fuck you."  Which was sort of an homage to "Office Space."  the, "here is me expressing myself to you!" sort of thing.  All in good fun.
Keep stating the obvious and maybe... no wait nothing will happen let's just bow our heads and salute our fuhrer.
So . . . You will believe that when an insider comes out and says "Yeah, those assholes were going to do something stupid. I heard it myself."  That means you believe Clark who said they wanted to Iraq 2 days after 9/11.  You believe O'Neill who said "they were planning to attack Iraq 2 days after they took office". You believe McClellan when he says "They lied to me about Plame" . . . sending the country on a multi-year multimillion dollar goose chase when it was Cheney that authorized the leak.  __Me, I believe those bastards need to be out of office becuase I have no idea what they hell they will do next.  I can totally see them attacking iran__
Yes, they *want* us to die.
I wonder where reddit falls?
"I reject your reality and substitute my own" -*Dick Cheney*
Well, given the nature of scripting languages, there are three components your users would need to install. On Windows, these installation files measure as follows: Qt4 for Mingw (90MB), Python (11MB), and PyQt4 (20MB). These are hefty, but my experience has been that you gain a lot of productivity by avoiding the extra compilation step involved when your GUI code is in C++. Moreover, thanks to a number of Python utilities, it is still possible to [deploy your application in binary form](http://www.diotavelli.net/PyQtWiki/Deploying_PyQt_Applications).   If you want to get started quickly, you could try installing something like [Python\(x,y\)](http://www.pythonxy.com/), which contains PyQt and other goodies. On Linux, of course, you should just rely on your package manager of choice.   Regarding the licensing issues, my understanding is that the license for PyQt4 is the same as whatever Qt4 license you selected (GPL or commercial).  And since Qt4 is already distributed under the GPL, I doubt there's much that Nokia could do after the fact. Even if they were to stop making new versions, there would probably be enough demand to make a fork possible. That's the whole point about open source software, after all :-)   I hope that helps!
The administration's track record of telling the truth is . . . 
or anywhere on the internet.
Wow, that was a detailed reply, thank you for the information. 
Well, it does. I think you could use this picture in the Wikipedia article on gluttony.
Yes.  For all sorts of reasons.  Unforseen interactions, complications with existing conditions, etc. But among those reasons is NOT that the product is *inherently poisonous.* Even if a few unsafe products slip through, or unsafe uses of them become known after approval, the vast majority of dangerous pharmaceutical products *are* weeded out long before they reach store shelves.
It's a nice statement, but it's quite a stretch to suggest that it relates to the diet guidelines in Leviticus!
No, you're looking at it wrong. *What interests do they, along with others, have in common."
Jesse and Ron Paul!  What a ticket!  Edit: Paul/Ventura 2012!
That was actually really hilarious, especially because I have to sit between the bitchy WoW-squad at work.  Nobody cares that you "downed" Grand Overlord Dagnarble.  I can't believe people play that shit anyway.  Anyways, my point is: Upmodded for Wild Turkey.
There might be a total of 30 websites out there at a *very* high estimate that generate original comedy of this sort. (I might argue that the total is four.) People who post this sort of stuff on blogs are actually doing those sites a favor by preventing parasites and retards from visiting the source and mucking it up with [cancer](http://www.encyclopediadramatica.com/Newfag). That's easy to get over. What's not easy to get over is the watermarking, and if you don't understand why you never will.
Oh I know. Car's have gotten to the point that all you are paying for when you buy porsche, lamborghini and ferrari is the name. The Z06 and GTR prove this....I want a GTR bad...I like my rb25det 240 but i like the gtr better.
Interesting! It's got a huge slant but there's plenty to think about. Many redditers will slam you. Preppies keeping the status quo. I liked it because it's taken some risks.
FTA: "Obama says that as president he will "set a goal for all American middle and high school students to perform 50 hours of service a year, and for all college students to perform 100 hours of service a year." What he doesn't say is that he'll make such voluntarism compulsory by attaching strings to federal education dollars. The schools will make the kids volunteer. It's called plausible deniability."
Because if you throw enough shit at the wall (or the browser window, in this case) something will stick...
He's still a little pissed he hasn't learned how that one ends
I agree with Grundle.  The legal definition of a human being is the important issue.  
I'd say that it's unoriginal, not dumb.
Don't you think that it's a little late for breakfast now?
... I'm putting my collar back down ...
theoretically he is right. kinda like theoretically the public controls the government.
If you've never been ounched in the face before, I can tell you it's a very traumatic experience.  At least no one got xtabbed.
No, I don't dispute it. That's not the point. The point is the Israeli occupation is the driving force and the policy that Palestinians support. Period. Yes they did build schools and hospitals and do all the things the PA didn't.  I'm not Palestinian. I guess you took my "I guess you don't know Palestinians" as saying I am Palestinians. I'm not. I see how that could be misconstrued. I have friends and family in the region. But mainly, I just try to stay on top of IR/IA, especially the IPC.
2 Comment?  This thread is already 29 comments long.
It's what happens when men are allowed to uncivilized, you'd be fucking SHOCKED at the sizable portion of men who revert to this level when it's not punished.
Free speech is a human construction and if other cultures refuse to bend to this particular moral imperative then I think that particular culture should be crushed and made to change.  Not unlike the subjugation and oppression of women is off the table.  There is no cultural sensitivity here for that shit either.
I guess you didn't understand the article.  Perhaps you'd be happier with the lolcats subreddit.
It's a profession built on confidence and egos. I'm not surprised. 
I already can't wait for the Olympics to be over.
[single page](http://www.computerworld.com.au/index.php/id;243672124;fp;;fpid;;pf;1)
Unfair? Unfair?! It's an arbitrary number on a website, even less significant than submission karma and only slightly more significant than a pancake crumb. It's also hardly witty, it's a tiny quote from Clerks. I'm going to upvote you because you care so much, however. Please don't spend it all in one place.
You forgot "Negroid" evangelical Christian Preacher (his being black having just about as much to do with this as being a preacher, ie, nothing)
isn't reddit awesome? sweet guy...
great! how soon can they bottle it an sell it?
I did not give [this](http://mathematics.mc.maricopa.edu/seims/TI-Emulator.htm) to you...
And, also, the second rule of Meme Club...
&gt; A noive asked  What was the Master doing in Brooklyn?
Who said anything about "killing" I just want to carve little xs into their foreheads.
that was a beautiful read.
No.  It's just far too convenient to be able to disown someone who has been a lifelong member of a religious group when they commit an atrocity in order to maintain the moral high ground.  It's bullshit.  
I swear every TV Commercial made in the 80's was intended as a comedy
Because I pay taxes for the police to do their job, I would like to make sure they are doing their job. If the government paid me a ultra exorbitant amount of money every month to watch my every move I might consider it for a while. I we all pay several billion dollars to put food on the table for these men and women, I as one of their millions of bosses want to make sure they deserve it. The cameras can help them put bad guys behind bars just as well as it can keep innocent people out of the cell.
VAT OCCURS IN MEIN CHAIR
:-D
Mccain  is none of them.
Damn you for stealing my thunder.
YC alberta is YYC, the calgary airport.
"First they ignore you, then they ridicule you, then they fight you, then you win." -- Robbie Williams.
Holy crap, I'm not the only one.
"the children" is mostly a pretext although I am sure there is a minority that actually believe that crap.
Want us to wipe your ass as well?
Here's an [article on the same subject](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2008/07/080715165520.htm). Apparently Dr. Sudhir Paul published his theory this June, and is planning on presenting more data in a few days: &gt; Additional data supporting the theory are to be presented at the XVII International AIDS Conference Aug. 3-8 in Mexico City in two studies  Hopefully human trials will begin soon. It would be so cool if this worked out.
I watched the old one just this afternoon, and let me tell you, I think you are seriously under-estimating Gene Wilder's performance. I know, I know--it was a more innocent time--but at one point he actually puts his hand under Veruca Salt's fur coat.
yet another way to make Japanophiles embarrass themselves.
The person who originally claimed it was 500,000 years old retracted his statement and claimed it was 100 year old mud in the article. This was stupid.
The one time in the history of computing when NOT copying and pasting leads to problems.. 
I thought about applying but then I saw the pay rate and was thought "Hell no" Government job should do better than $10 an hour. If haliburton can get 800 million no bid I want at least 10k a month.
Think of it this way.  Obama is an unknown. We KNOW that McCain will be bad.
I would try the catterpilars, the wasp, and the grubs.  The beetles &amp; grasshoppers look too gross.  
That's why I said sometimes :)
My wife doesn't like cuddling either AND when after 1 orgasm she is done, period (when we used to have sex).  I actually like a women that can orgasm multiple times, mainly because I like sex so much that I can last a long while.  Hey, sex is good, so why finish it soooo fast?  Make it last as long as you can and enjoy it.
Bears just need roots and berries.  Not pertinent to the discussion.
If it becomes such a dire issue that no state can handle, the representatives from each state are free to amend the constitution.
Sarcasm?  If so, that's pretty funny.
Meshuggah
Hey, at least the Taliban has job security. 
FISA: Because terrorist and shee-it
"My parents went to China and all they brought back was this..."
Having seen Starbucks here in Australia, in the cities of Melbourne, Brisbane and Sydney...the answer is "too damned many stores". When you have them so close together that you can stand outside one and see others...they're too close.  We don't need starbucks on both sides of the street on the same block, for example.  Although the article brings up a good point, there are a lot of "real cafe's" here...so why go to the chain of cafe's?
There can be only one!
the Romulans are more of an asian stereotype, leading off of the chinese math stereotype into the vulcan logic thing, a combination of the two but with visual and racially violent undertones more reminiscent of our WWII propaganda posters of the Japanese.  But because of how corrupt they were, they had to make Cardassians dark gray.  They're tainted white people.  They're supposed to be like, the exception that proves the rule or something.
Thats a cute and lazy statement, how about actually coming up with a half decent response? An explanation perhaps?
your face. 
Look at the guy's voting record. If there's anything we can count on coming from him, it's complete consistency (whether you agree with his decisions or not). I read sensationalist stuff like this about the man all the time, and gauge the reactions of the overly-emotional redditors, so I look into it and I find out that there is complete intellectual dishonesty (and an utter lack of research, as they continually cling to sensational headlines without researching a damn thing) in their complaints. It's happened so much that I will in fact agree that I have adopted an investigative attitude. I wouldn't say it's apologism at all. After looking at the massive amount of pork and nanny state bullshit in this Bill, I would not vote for it either unless I could do it in a line-item fashion, which I couldn't. I have not been disappointed with his consistency once. Now let's talk about Obama or Mccain...
Fuck it with that fucker ? 
Your comment was brief, and indicated that socializing losses on private companies somehow still resembled capitalism.  FYI. It's not.
Screw the Riddler. I want to see Batman fight Dr. Horrible!
Neither
The part about how people treat babies is spot on.  The thing can't even sit upright; what possible difference will it make if you think it's one gender or the other?  You're sick, people.
&gt;Oil companies cut production this p.m., and oil costs went back up, since demand is down.  enough said
What, when she was eighteen months old???
Google Earth has real time zoom. That's what I meant (in this site you have to wait before it zooms in.)
+1 for link containing phrase "intranets are legion"
if that is every stupid cable you need my cable box would be a lot smaller.
we already have a modern example of what this is like, modern saudi arabia. it's driven by greed and corruption. the ruling elite are beggars with billions. they own mansions and retreats all along the mediterranean were their slaves are beaten and raped; as if one of those wasn't enough. their holidays consist of perversion, $1000 bottles of wine by the case and any drug you can imagine, although mostly it's cocaine, in quantities meant for entire cities.  the royal family owns the entire population, just look at a passport sometime. they have religious police. women are considered as actual property. they have massive unemployment and at 11-14% it doesn't include women who make up about 5% of the workforce.  nice work if you can get it, huh?
No. Just not even close to being funny.
hereisa.fsh
Let me add #11 to the list since this has been bothering me for quite a while.   If you have hairy forearms, SHAVE them! Guys are not attracted to hairy women, and if the only hair on your body is on your head and on your arms, guess which we'll be looking at. It pisses me off so much when I see women who wax every inch of their body, have smooth legs, armpits and even their privates are shaved, but have just as much hair on their forearms as any other guy. 
&gt;They look like hamsters with racing stripes.  You say that like it's a bad thing.
Don't be so quick to equate finely cooked insects with just "dead bugs".  They were farm raised, cooked to perfection (they cook fast) and seasoned according to their inherent flavors.   BTW half the world eats bugs, and it's not just because of poverty. Emperor Hirohito's favorite dish was wasps in rice.  
Anyone else notice a kind-of Mona Lisa-esque quality to his "smile"?  If you tilt your head a little . . .
The dreaded double negative should never not be attempted in a fart joke.
Clings to unreality? Sounds similar to how the man made global warming crowd clings to their bullshit religion that humans are a cancer on the earth despite the planet being in a cooling phase.  The problem for the multi-billion dollar international business called man-made global warming is that the Earth's temperature rise is in fact over.  The results of all four major global temperature tracking outlets (Hadley, NASA's GISS, UAH, RSS) released data that show that, over the past year(Mar2007-Mar2008), global temperatures have dropped dramatically. The total amount of cooling ranges from 0.65C up to 0.75C. Indeed, the drop in global temperature was large enough to erase nearly all the global warming recorded over the past 100 years. The last year was in fact the single fastest temperature change every recorded, in either direction.  Now, the real question is when will the all the hype of man-made global warming become a defunct, bankrupt business.   http://www.eworldvu.com/international/2008/3/1/the-year-of-sun-made-global-cooling.html
Ron Paul has a multitude of reasons for not supporting it.  For example, from the CFL blog:  * It authorizes $626 million in new money over six years for the Consumer Product Safety Commission without any offsets in the overall congressional budget, further driving up our debt and devaluing our dollar.  *  It creates new mandatory standards for four-wheel all-terrain vehicles, temporarily banning three-wheel all-terrain vehicles until they devise safety rules for them. This was added in conferences.  *  It encourages frivolous Eliot Spitzer-type lawsuits by allowing state attorney generals to bring lawsuits based on violations of federal law.  *  It also creates new federal standards for garage door openers and cigarette lighters. A little overboard with the regulations, perhaps?  *  It permits the Consumer Product Safety Commission to use asset forfeiture, a system that has been abused in the past by law enforcement.
Productive... surfing?
"If only I'd studied a little more in high school..."
Well, a write in vote won't be counted.  If you vote for a third party (even if not the LP) at least your vote sends the message "I'm sick of the increasingly similar two party candidates but am politically involved enough that I still took the time and cast a vote."  
And it's utterly re-volt-ing.
9-11 truthers are awesome.
Funnily enought, they're closing most of the stores outside of Melbourne, Brisbane and Sydney, so this is not the reason.
I should have elaborated. This is privatization of profit, and socializing of loss.  But you are correct, fascism is the correct term. 
and then smack them for using a rectangular connector and making me plug stuff in upside down every frickin time.
I agree that's better. The one in the article looks like someone has a fish bukkake fetish.
They ride around naked in a black van fighting crime.
I think the ratings might be low.  However, the world might be watching to see how badly the Chinese fuck the whole thing up.  The Olympics will be like other Chinese products: it will be Cheap, a reasonable facsimile of a Western or Japanese product but not quite as good, made with cheap slave labor and possibly contain some sort of latent poison.
I don't think people are pirating as much as they used to, nothing good has come out in nigh 6-8 years now.
but at laest I slept until noon three days this week.
Corrected.
So what's your point?   Here, check this out.  http://ask.metafilter.com/97406/What-size-distribution-of-promotional-tshirts-should-I-buy  The point is that the Linux Symposium people figured out that they fucked up and ordered the wrong sizes, and they've clued in and corrected that mistake.  I don't know why potroast was modded down, s/he is absolutely correct.
You can buy it.  It's tasty and expensive.
I wrote it on my arm
Silence!  What is all this insolence?  You will find yourself in gladiator school vewwy quickly with wotten behavior like that.
My flight leaves at 12:30 AM on Saturday and I'll be in Korea for a year.  As far as once winter hits, I'll be snowboarding whenever I've got free time.  Unfortunately (for me), a nuclear winter has yet counteract the effects of global warming so I need to know some fun stuff to do during the off season.  I've tried googling, but when I look up "Where to party in Korea" I get a bunch of political links and everyone else who's ever been there only posts scenic and historical/cultural places (which I also plan on visiting, but already know of from family and google).
well, the only other option he had was 'targeted killing' by israel.
Maybe the customer wasn't looking for a specific game for his son, he wanted a suggestion for what his son would like. Since the female employee has no experience being a young boy maybe he thought the male employee would have better suggestions about what his son would enjoy. This would seem to be the case since the customer is asking about the content of the games, and I think it's probably reasonable. I don't know how happy the customer's son would be with Imagine: Babyz. 
wow.  this gave me a woody that simply won't quit.  Opel, mass produce this car!!!!!
to all those self-accredited anti-conspiracy theorists, this is what a false flag attack looks like. if the vp is bold enough to say this to an open audience, imagine what he could think up and discuss behind closed doors. in fact you may have already seen it.
PANTS-BREAKING: Sexual assault in military jaw-dropping
I do believe that an amendment was passed to put an end to those laws.
What the fuck has John McCain done lately besides eat sausage and talk shit?
So it is okay for the government to do it because it will do it poorly and a high cost?  I think you've proven my point.
I'm a developer at [Sunlight Labs](http://sunlightfoundation.com) where we do a ton of web development, often on a tight schedule due to the political nature of our work.  I started my job about a year ago as an intern and was told I could use whatever tools I wanted.  I used Django and finished pretty fast and with good results (although we ended up not using that particular project)  one of my coworkers had wanted to use more Python and was inerested in Django so the two of us basically converted everyone else to Django
A resolution should be introduced stating that this transparent, duplicitous, consciously traitorous, Likud agent in place should be honored for sticking to the five main issues that concern him and like-minded thinkers the most.  Israel, Israel, Israel, Israel, and how to keep the expenditure in blood and treasure from America flowing to Israel without honest debate.  In his efforts to help his country of true loyalty, he will publicly court nominal Christian/Zionists, and disregard their death cult end time fantasies, that at best are truly anti-Semitic.   He will ceaselessly whine and agitate with the rest of primary and dual neocon loyalists in their desire for war with Iran...with American money and blood, in their delusion of securing the realm for the Zionists.  How it is that no one calls him on his open treason is beyond belief...this is not America.
No, you took a simple answer and fucked it all up.  The first CHICKEN was inside a CHICKEN EGG laid by some sort of PROTO-CHICKEN.  Don't ask how, it's SCIENCE. Then the CHICKEN laid another CHICKEN EGG and the species continued.  Mmmm, protochicken...nom nom nom.
&gt;, murderers,    Oh the irony.
You guys are yankin' me. "Hey, let's put one over on Whereverjustice."  ...What? That's insane. That's impossible.  Oh God. Oh my God. I've got all these magazines. Oh God. 
DO NOT WANT!*  *True only on opposite day(s)
I'd prefer a sausage and chocolate chip pancake on a stick, thank you very much!
too damn delicious to relagate to the appropriate subreddit
I'm getting **Seriously Fucking Tired** of one liar after another tells me to believe him or her, rather than my own lying eyes.
Took a moment before I noticed your disclaimer "for their beliefs". Convenient way of sidestepping the holocaust.
*Picks script up out of garbage, makes minor changes and sells it as a shitty made-for-tv movie.*
http://www.the-planets.com/star-biography/Laura-Prepon-Biography.jpg
wow i should start a internet comic that appeals to people with very exclusive senses of humor and then pretend like im going to run for office.
&gt;august. __adj__ noble; imposing.  Stop downvoting just because you're illiterate.
http://www.the-planets.com/star-biography/Laura-Prepon-Biography.jpg
So that's how they make bondage wear
http://www.the-planets.com/star-biography/Laura-Prepon-Biography.jpg
It didn't say she sent him cash dipshit. It says he had $1200 cash.  How much do you make? Is it unheard of for you to have cash on hand before a trip? There is a hell of a lot more involved in a trip than the ticket - plus, maybe, just maybe she said "here's a grand kid, I know you've got a shitty life that will likely end ~50 years earlier than it should, buy yourself some nice clothes, go out for a couple of good meals, go see a movie or 5, use part of it to pay the rent so you have some more spending cash over the next month - oh and use about $300 on a flight down here to see me."  You are truly a fucking stain on the human race. I can't believe you can convince yourself that having less than the average american's paycheck in your home automatically makes you a criminal. By your fucking standard, I'd have been locked up every month  when it was time for the landlord to come by in several of the places I've lived in the past.
You don't eat pig and we don't pig.  It seems its been that way forever.  And if you don't eat pig and we don't eat pig...  Why not, not eat pig together.  -- [Tim Minchin](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_T4Wk9M2ObE) (video)
Maybe, but Mister T would have slammed the guy much more effectively.
Not if Han Solo was aboard cause he would have shot first before things got ugly. Also, with a knife, you don't need to reload. If that guy had directed some of that excessive stabbing and decapitation time towards other bus riders he probably could have killed maybe 3-4 people. I imagine the elderly would have been easy.  Anywho, guns in the hands of ordinary responsible citizens is a good thing. You make guns illegal then criminals have the edge because they can rest assured that if they attack someone, that person will not be armed and any onlookers will unarmed and without confidence to attempt to help. Contrary to popular belief, the country will not descend into the wild-wild West.  All citizens with an IQ above 100 and no criminal record should be required to own a gun and know how to use it. The law should allow any criminal offenders to be shot and killed if a threat.
Interrupting Cow.
spl.org FTW.
Reversing an implication, a common error.
I used to hang out at a coffee shop (The Laughing Cup in Minneapolis) years ago and watched the following exchange; Customer: (pissed about something stupid) "I want to talk to your manager"   Markus: (The guy behind the counter)OK... I'll get him.  (walks into the office and walks right back to the customer)  "Hi. I'm Markus, how can I help you?"   C:  Oh you think you are cute, huh?  I want to talk to the owner!   M:  (Walks to the office and back again) "Hi. I'm Markus, what seems to be the problem?"  C:  Look, if this is the game you are going to play, I'm never doing business here again!   M: Really?  Do you promise?   C:  What?   M:  Do you promise not to come back?  You don't spend much, never tip and you are ruining the nice calm atmosphere in here.  As customers go, you kinda suck.   C:  (Packing his stuff to go) Is this how you run your business?!?!   M:  Yep, I worked two jobs and saved for 10 years so I could tell assholes like you to GET THE FUCK OUT OF MY SHOP! Have a nice day.   The rest of the customers gave a standing ovation as the creep stormed out and slammed the door. (Useless trivia - Victor Varnado, the albino black guy from "End of Days" used to hang out there, nice guy)
Would *you* want your daughter to stay a virgin forever?!
But the Pot is black!  Oh, the irony!
Wow. How closed minded and illiterate do u have to be to even consider thinking of posting this as being helpful to ur fellow Conservatives bastards.
So wait, you have rats - IN YOUR BED???? I don't even want to delve into the poo pellets. Can't imagine much non-Rattus maiting going on in your room buddy.
Refer to the submission.
I'm a lead developer and project manager at a Magazine publisher and creative firm. We use Django for al our sites and a good portion of our internal publishing tools. I developed 90% of it.  Django was an obvious choice.
sigh.. my state is one big green blob :(
Awww yay for cops!
It is not terribly accurate.  The Wal-Mart in my neighborhood wasn't there at all, but there was a dot in the middle of a residential neighborhood.
I think that it's not safe to put any American city out of the clear when it comes to families not being able to afford food.  America has so many homeless, that it should come as no surprise. http://seattleconcrete.blogspot.com/2006/10/using-barbecue-smokers-for-added.html The sad thing is, for as many poor people we have in this country, there or just as many ungrateful greedy people who waste food like there's no tomorrow...
The electrician was probably gay.
Education is concentrated in the upper classes.  Do you really think there's much difference in inborn ability across classes?
It looks like America has a bad rash that it caught while partying in the 60s and it just spread to consume the entire country.
He's a cute dick though (in that pic).
The IE team says this behavior is by design.
Good, and we'll tell you to name your child douchebag
I'll try to write up the process, with source code, sometime soon. It wasn't too tricky...a few hundred lines of CL. It's just a bit on the ugly side...I really wanted to push through with all my visual ideas without linearizing the code and doing much logical organization. 
Open an account at interactivebrokers.com and buy GC contracts. Or mini's if you don't want a $100k position.  Futures leverage allows you to have a sizable investment in gold while freeing up your funds. You'll also have much better liquidity and lower transaction costs than buying and selling the physical commodity.
This is like when Cheney said he wasn't part of the executive branch. On the upside, if the White House denies Karl Rove exists, does that mean his executive privilege is gone?
Ron Paul will vote no on any bill regardless of its content that is not a power givin to the congress by the constitution. Period.  This isn't wrong or stupid, its the law. But go ahead and ignore that, having the federal government exceed it legal mandate is a good thing right? I mean look at all the good Bush has done ignoring it. And look at the good Obama is achieving in his illegal FISA stance, boy he sure is for the people.   The Rule of Law, in its most basic form, is the principle that no one is above the law. Thomas Paine.   That would be especially so for congress. 
I don't have any opinions that aren't endorsed by Ludacris.
Oh please.. I understand. It was his wording that makes "being" look like a verb. He intentionally contrasted growing versus being.  "a human growing, not a human *being*"  There's also a reason why the noun being has it's root in the verb being. "Being" as a noun means a living existence, as in "existence", as in "be".  BTW, you just misused the word conjugation, smarty pants. Had you said "as a particular conjugation **of** "be"" you might have made sense. You're trying to look smart with your fancy words but you failed. Just say "verb" next time.
&gt;What we ought to  Not 'What I will do is'
how do you know?
Ouch, you're making me look bad. Nice program.  I opted for a more powerful rule-table approach; for example, I represented full house as:  ([(1, None), (1, None),   (1, None),   (2, None),   (2, None)],  [1,2])  The first line is a pattern for the hand to match, with the numbers referring to match groups, and `None` meaning that any suite will match. The second line is the sort key. It's overkill for poker hand sorting, as you demonstrated, which is probably why my program was so long.
I joined mixx before thinking about joining reddit, I now avoid it like aids mixed with plague after I was just critizing a tone-mapped picture that was labeled as "HDR" (it wasn't) and then my fucking comment got fucking deleted by "administrator" or whatever. I got the hell out of there to never come back, then I decided to visit reddit more often and I started to like it and the rest was history.
It is that attitude of the right wingers that all left wingers hate guns that causes great problems.  This is absolutely not true.  There are right wingers who hate firearms and left wingers who actively believe in the 2nd amendment.  What a way to alienate others by making the claims that Clancy did in this interview.
Funny you should pick this as an example.  A ton of our health insurance already comes from the government..ala Medicare - alphabet soup on your paycheck is FICA.  The recent attempt to privatize this only privatized who is collecting the money from the government, not the insurance itself.   Let me give you an example.  An elderly relative of mine was just put on an expensive piece of medical equipment that costs ~$1500.00.  The doctor ordered it for her from a rental company that accepts medicare.  The rental company is charging medicare (government health insurance).  $~260.00 a month.   Medicare will pay the rental bill for 36 months and then she will own the piece of equipment.  If you multiply that out, it is over $9000.00 in rental fees for a $1500.00 piece of equipment.  It gets better.  The medicare co-pay is 20 percent for her.  So, if you figure that out, her co-pay comes to just about what the equipment costs.  The rest is gravy collected from the government.  Who is exactly letting this 'fester?' -Oh yeah..the rental company has a bunch of costs involved with complying with all of the alphabet soup like HIPPA.  I have seen some of her medical bills from a recent hospital stay - it was close to 200K.   See, everyone has the tendency to want the cookies out of the government cookie jar.  Everyone wants that money. If it were a private insurance company, or billing the patients savings account/the patient paying the bills directly - they would have to justify these bills and be competitive, but not with the Government system we have.  They just borrow more money and print more money.   The canidates we have now want to make this worse..and make it bigger.    This system we have is unsustainable.  'IF' it were real insurance, it would not be..or better yet..scrap the whole thing like Ron Paul wants to do, continue to support the people who are currently depending on it but from this point forward - let people save for their own retirement and pick the insurance program that they want (if they even want one).  Let charity and family pick up the rest.  It WOULD work.   Go back about 100 years in this countries history when we didn't have all these taxes and bureacracy and you will see people were much more prosperous and could afford to save for their own care..or their job would provide it.  Go back just 50 years and one person working at an average job could support a whole family.  Now they can't afford to. There is a root to this problem and it is our money system.  Our current fiat system causes money to flow up to the wealthy.  If we were still on the Gold Standard, it causes a persons savings to be worth more or weath to flow down to individuals.  It lets them save money, start businesses and be innovative.  As it is now, the government prints more money for programs like Medicare.  Politicians like programs like this because it gets them votes when they can give away money and fix peoples problems.   Devalues peoples savings and salaries and makes them more dependent on government.  It causes fraud and waste.  It makes us weak as people and weak as a nation. It makes us depend on the government instead of depending on ourself like we used to.  It is a vicious circle.  Google 'Money as Debt' and watch that.   
So a burger-flipper should be flipping burgers at a faster pace?  Some jobs just don't pay well, no matter how "productive" you are. Some script kiddie who sits in a cubicle can be considered more economically productive, but it's not by virtue of actual hard work, it's mostly due to technological increases.  &gt;Increases in productivity: Companies can increase productivity in a variety of ways. The most obvious methods involve automation and computerization which minimize the tasks that must be performed by employees.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Productivity
Just watching her talk..or yell is scary enough to kill off more of my brain cells than smoking pot would. I say Fox News Manchurian candidate.
if we spend money to make people pay us money so we can get money because we need more money we will make more money.
&gt;A free market ends where a business becomes a criminal enterprise.  In order for a business to be a criminal enterprise, it must have violated the law. If there is no law, what are the courts going to enforce when the state brings criminal charges against the business? These things traditionally fall under civil suits, but what's free market about those? If it's the personal responsibility of consumers to buy safe products, why should there be civil suits?
Hahaha, holy shit. Huge amounts of pork in bills as a reason not to vote for them. Yeah Ron Paul must be a fucking idiot &lt;/sarcasm&gt;. Just out of curiosity, where can a person find the text of the actual bills so I don't have to sift through inaccurate articles and opinion pieces written by uninformed idiots?
The worlds oldest joke is the one about that guy creating the earth, the heavens and everything in between.
I agree. This shit is why 9/11 happened in the first place. A large group of people run from a vastly outnumbered attacker because they are afraid. Thirty people can easily subdue a few on a plane, and especially take down a lone guy crouched over a bus seat.  If anyone had just grabbed the guy after the first stab that kid might still be alive. They should all blame themselves, and die a little more inside each day.  edit: You can downmod me all you want, but it is fucking true. A few guys with plastic knives took over some planes and killed 3000 folks, started a war, and put us in this horrible state. Had the people on the planes not been cowards they might still be here today.  The same goes for this kid. Had **any** of the people that were within **inches** of this guy simply made an effort, that kid might be here today.. But no, the first thought was to get the fuck off the bus and smack people on the head while they ran pissing themselves.
I already do this with paperbackswap.com
They ride around naked in a black van, smoking weed and fighting crime.
I don't fit into any category, but I hate capitalism and I hate primitivism.
and that's why i drive a locomotive to work!
OO, yummy.  Melted chocolate chips.
Since when is "douchebag" adhering to corpotate-American-cool CaliptaliZation?
Thank ya! :)
The list continues to grow...
i have a sneaking suspicion that the reason we are seeing all this hording around the oil industry is because in a few years they are going to "re-invent" energy because oil is dying off and they are going to need a springboard to launch new innovation from.  just a hunch... not based on any fact... just my opinion.
Where?  I'm not a fully practicing Christian by the way.  You think it'll be safe to eat?
The local library has a relatively smaller selection.
How long until this guy is found death from "self inflicted" 10 bullets in the head and the case declared not suspicious.
Pants breaking sex!  Unleash the beast!  Feed the monster within.
So here's the deal: my landlord (who is an idiot, but apparently a attorney and a landlord and a cpa) sent a letter today that says that he gets to keep my security deposit, because I didn't give him a 60 day written notice (I gave him a month). His letter says "basically, the lease provides that you provide me with a 60 day written notice of your intent to vacte the premises. Had you provided me with proper notice..." From that he decides he can extend the lease date a month. He goes on to say that I owe him $200 more than the security deposit, but he is willing to "call it even if you agree." Otherwise, court. The only mention of my lease is this &gt;If tenant holds over after the term of this lease expires and Landlord does not object, the tenacy will be from year to year from then on, in the absence of a written agreement to the contrary. **If Tenant intends to vacate the Premises prior to the termination date fo this Lease. Tenant shall give to Landlord sixty (60) days notice of this fact.** If tenant fails to furnish said written notice to landlord, then in this case Tenant directs landlord to interpret the lack of said notice to be tenant's offer to continue to lease the leasehold for an additional one year term. The additional one year term will commence on the date of expiration of this original lease Agreement and will be under all of the exact terms and conditions of this Lease agreement except for the rental charge that is paid to Landlord by tenant. If Landlord elects to accept Tenants's offer to continue this lease for an additional one year term, then the monthly rent will be at a rate equal to the rate paid by the tenant, plus an additional one percent.  So the stuff in bold is the problem. Yes, that is not a complete sentence, and it is really how it appears in the lease, but this says to me, "if and only if you are moving out before the lease expires, then you must give 60 days." the termination date is defined only once as June 30, 2008.   So do I win? Anyone comment, but if you have a law background, PM me, I'd just like to clarify a few things about this.  **edit:** We vacated on the lease termination date, so that if condition isn't met. right?  **editedit** Thank you all so much for your input, this is helpful, and I am getting a better idea where I should go with this.
Just a quick point: Stalin was an atheist.
Feels good, man.  /meme
Not quite what I was looking for, but helpful I guess.
PICS OR IT DIDNT HAPPAN!
Exactly.  They need a website or something that has every dollar spent.  City, County, State and Federal.
fifth solar revolution this year. 
You apparently didn't read the article.  It's not necessarily about wanting something for free, but wanting it in a way that is reliable and convenient.  Also, it plainly stated that most pirated music (specifically) is music people most likely wouldn't have purchased to begin with.
Fen-phen is safe.  DDT is A-OK.  Eggs kill you.  Butter is bad.   OK.  What else will the government decide for me today?   2800 choking deaths a year http://www.kidsource.com/safety/prevent.choke.html   Is still need a number for children harmed by lead.  Anyone?  I think 8300 is the best I can come up with.
Quebec Remparts goaltender Jonathan Roy, the 19-year-old son of Hall of Fame goaltender, team coach and general manager Patrick Roy, faces assault charges after viciously beating Chicoutimi Sagueneens goalie Bobby Nadeau during the teams’ Quebec Major Junior Hockey League playoff game in March. The charge was filed in Saguenay, where the playoff match occurred.
Awesome truthers are douches.
' total power rises from 110 hp to 150 between now and 2010'  This is still backward thinking. With every updated model cars get bigger and more powerful. Its an out of date concept that needs to change. Yes it gets the same mileage but really we are looking to improve with each change, not have set a benchmark and ensure we dont drop below that standard. Lets not let size creep enter the reins of the hybrid as it has the generation of cars previous and also the entire first world population.
It is Fern Ridge Lake, it's back to normal now. Two years ago it was drawn down for an entire year so that the Corps of Engineers could work on the dam.  I went mountain biking on the lake bed several times that summer. It was great fun.
Hehe, one of the authors is named Hosenball...
Meh, whatever.  We allowed Nazi Germany to host the Olympics as they saw fit, I see no reason to treat China differently.  It's their country, after all.
Actually, you're wrong, the Supreme Court even finally made a ruling on the matter just a month ago - they decided that it WASN'T limited to the National Guard.  It is only still up in the air because activists that cannot legitimately get a Constitutional Amendment to change it will continue to try to legislate from the bench.
Never been, but I'm jealous.  The market areas are the center of city life, so that should be pretty interesting. TBH I would just alternate between visiting family, eating bulgogi, and playing video games at the internet cafe.
quantity theory of money  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quantity_theory_of_money  http://mikehammock.blogspot.com/2007/02/beavis-butthead-and-quantity-theory-of.html  plus, "he's trying to touch my weiner" is also a great analogy of the u.s. economy, which ends in a fatal mistake by mr. candy-ass, with correction being delivered by the cruel FOOT of monetary inflation in the form of coach buzzcut kicking you in the gonads as prices rise.
My cat had fleas so we just ran a magnet over her.
i cant stop laughing either. i think i 've been laughing for the past 3 hours, i shall stop laughing now. //closes all reddit tabs, refreshes reddit home page
"the dark of ignorance &amp; hatred" - erm, yes, the american people (ignorance) voted bush into his second term and in iraq alone he murdered 1 million people (hatred).   "light of truth &amp; love" - jesus himself told bush to attack iraq.   it almost sounded like you meant christianity is the light of truth &amp; love. troll.
He wouldn't even face me if I had the babe in arms. But he did try to ask my oldest son, who was 7 at the time, about how many amps I would need upstairs vs. downstairs.
Won't you think of the children?  Edit: Specifically, [this child?](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6udiw/theyre_youngpic/c04w39c)  Seriously, out of all the stupid bullshit comments I've ever made, the one time I say something funny I lash it to the wrong friggin copy of the exact same movie quotation!  And it gets buried by kipi's dumbass comment about "unfairness" in points being assigned to Reddit comments!   Well!  ARE YOU HAPPY.
I like pie. 
So the simple question remains: why are you entitled to an artist's work for free?
You're doing it wrong.
Tell them it's the one scar you left alone when you had plastic surgery fix up all the other ones.  It's a reminder of your time in a prison camp during the Vietnam War and it reminds you of the sacrifice that your comrades made every morning when you look in the mirror.  It'll also help if you stare off into space and let your words drift off and randomly start screaming and "hitting the deck" when you hear loud noises.
Well, the male is more likely to impact the female
gitmo?
THEY ARE RIPPING US OFF AT THE PUMP!
"I Still Can't Believe They Elected Me for a Second Term"
Somehow I doubt that it was based on kickbacks, given that a bidding war of bribes would be easy to trace (relatively) and that someone would probably want to out it for fun and profit. Not to mention that Beijing wouldn't necessarily have one such a war.
i've actually never heard of a vaporizer using PVC tubing. I would also assume this is a bad idea. The vaporizer tested by the UCLA study was the world famous Volcano Vaporizer. It uses a ceramic heating element and air does pass over some electrical components, however no negative effects were shown. From use, I can tell you the negative affects are usually just an off taste and dryness. I personally use a Silver Surfer vaporizer. It uses high quality ceramic surrounded by a pure glass on glass connection. In my personal experience, this is the best I've used for vaporizing marijuana. The taste is excellent and it feels like bathing your lunges in a warm bath. There has recently been developments using Halogen heating elements as a heat source. This would most likely be even cleaner then ceramic. I havent had a chance to use one yet. But your thinking is correct. The more foreign objects between the heat source and your lungs, the more chance for contamination. Generally speaking, in the world of vaporizers, if you spend more that $250, you're probably going to get a safe, quality item.
The oil trading today is for delivery in August/September.  While that does have some effect on prices today, it won't be that significant. 
Not hard to lose an ethics contest with a group with no professed ethics.
I know, right?  I think the track is **fucking epic**.  That's why I gotta find out the artist!  http://drop.io/o9s6paj
Exactly my point to the submitter.  Well said.
You indicated that making fun of AlGore == climate change denial.
that lemon one is ... weird.  All in all though, very good adverts.
That does look flashy but the floating window bothers me. I would want to see the comments and the text without having to manually move the window. Just like what code chat and google code review do. That's what I think both systems are really playing on. The comments already existed before anyone created these things but it's the placing of them directly within the context of the text or code they are referring to that is nice.
The Food For Life Baking Company makes it.  You can buy it in health food stores or better grocery stores.  Around here, it usually comes frozen; this is good because it's expensive, as I said, and each slice is a lot more nutritious than Wonder bread.  I prefer their "7 Sprouted Grains" bread.  Tasty!  EDIT: Yeah, it's perfectly safe.  I have no problem with it, and just being in the same room as holy water gives me a rash.
But it's sealed and so... elegant... All rounded and cool looking. 
Do the ~50% of people who don't fall for it get what they deserve too?
Nope.
I'd like to know where they got a figure for Marijuana overdoses.  Since it's impossible and such. 
The semicolon is dead in vulgar writings, but it still has it's place.
so it's not pronounced "del-ickie-oh-us" then?
Alexa only registers IE visits. Google Trends [tells a different story](http://trends.google.com/websites?q=reddit.com,+mixx.com&amp;sa=N). Edit: Also, apparently redditors (and diggers) like searching for "scotch tape mosquito bites".
From the link YOU provided: "The counterfeit glycerin passed through three trading companies on three continents, yet not one of them tested the syrup to confirm what was on the label. Along the way, a certificate falsely attesting to the purity of the shipment was repeatedly altered, eliminating the name of the manufacturer and previous owner. As a result, traders bought the syrup without knowing where it came from, or who made it. With this information, the traders might have discovered — as The Times did — that the manufacturer was not certified to make pharmaceutical ingredients."   So I guess laws and regulations MISERABLY FAILED to protect people. Which is exactly my point. Clearly, ( from the example YOU provided,) there were laws and regulations hard at work - people had to actively circumvent the rules by altering the certificate of purity. Gee, I guess your theory isn't holding up very well, is it?  Try to THINK, idiotbystander. What is the *mechanism* at work that magically protects people from harm, protection that is somehow provided by laws and regulations? Are you claiming that fear of legal consequences prevents harm in the US? Then explain the cigarette industry! An entire multi-billion dollar industry devoted to poisoning people, subsidized by the government!   If mere reason and logic are beyond you, then I refer you to a simple graph that illustrates my point in a way that even you can grasp: http://www.worldaffairsboard.com/political-discussions/42793-how-effective-has-osha-been-reducing-workplace-deaths.html
He is offering you the fish on behalf of Jesus. 
They don't. It's just a fart in a whirlwind, serving up Katrina-style relief after a comparatively minor (compared to what's to come) breach of our economic levees. It seems something major happening is an inevitability at this point, and government will use this opportunity to step in with a new New Deal that again will only prolong bad times, and after about a 20 year extrusion of this nonsense and a weak recovery the people will again sing the praises of government interventionism and continue along their path of willful ignorance and blind obedience. Nothing to see here. Move along.
I was thinking this was going to be Bob Sapp vs. Kimo  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S4bhx3uiEFM
Those shirts were all cut by horribly amateurish seamstresses. I couldn't see a single hemmed edge in the whole photo. That alone distracted me from the girls, which means that this is not a sexy photo. Put it in the sewing subreddit or something.
If there was less discrimination, less unreasonable fear, and more equality, we would be close to the safest and happiest place.  Granted, right now Detroit is more violent than Johanasburg, but, for the most part, America is a relatively safe and happy place.   Switzerland is arguably the best place to live on earth.  Having mandatory firearms training should be advocated in America, like Switzerland.  If we took the fear out of the media and turned it into positive stories, highlighting where guns have helped people, or how guns improve personal confidence, we would be a safer, happier, and more free country.   Doing the same thing with equality and disparity might also help those areas.  It's when we focus on the bad that our lives get worse.   
I like to think of myself as an anti-statist. I think language is very important, and, although Proudhon's deconstruction of the term Anarchist was an important step in the growth of anti-statist thought, the term has never managed to shed it's connotation of violence. Likewise I eschew the term Libertarian. Even though the greats of nineteenth century anti-statism used the term exclusively, in modern parlance it describes a stance which only advocates minimizing governance while tacitly accepting the concept of the state-as-monopoly-of-violence as entirely valid.
True. Some look more like Johnny Rotten.
Thailand
Depends on the state law, but you're probably out of luck.
Adam Savage, for me.
This is a stupid argument. Anyone can start a newspaper, but there is only so much wireless broadband available for radio. 
god did...I mean the devil did it, he took control of the guy's body, abused the guy's daughter, killed the guy's wife and than left.  It is the most rational explanation.
and the reaction in israel was: YAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEHYAHWEH! oh wait...
Cheap plastic crap from China overwhelms the nation. 
They should just say that lard is what makes tortillas delicious, do they have those over there?
&lt;sarcasm&gt;too bad your crappy-several-hundred-dollars-less computer does such a crappy job at organizing your photos that your memories will be lost forever&lt;/sarcasm&gt;  ;)
Apple always was ahead of the curve.
https://www.911twenty.com/flare/next  Now you'll never forget, with this commemorative Liberian $20 bill made of 0.999 silver
Headline Fail.
Bullshit.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Regression_toward_the_mean
You seem pretty well informed about all of this...here is a question:  Will people text less?  &gt;When calculating SMS charges, most people don’t take into consideration that **the message is really being paid for twice!** If I send a message to another AT&amp;T user, I am paying to send it AND they’re paying to receive it! This should probably be illegal, but that’s for another discussion.
i've been reduced to nothing more than a pair of gonads by a woman before  : |
I'm, er, guessing here that the child may not *actually* be his.  It'd explain how he was able to "convince" her to let him name the bugger...anything to keep up the illusion...
Hur, because Hillary Clinton supporters will magically reinstate her as the democratic candidate and McCain will die before the election.  EDIT: Clearly, the author has no idea what he's talking about, because if any "alternative" candidate were to win, it would surely be Ron Paul.
The Elastic Clause authorizes the Congress to make all laws deemed necessary and proper to carry out the duties with which it is charged in the body of the document, at the censure of the Court. The Supremacy Clause then establishes the primacy of federal law over state law - that is, in an instance where state law and federal law clash, the state policy falls. The 10th Amendment has no bearing whatsoever on these issues. In other words, though it is a nice buzzword there is *nothing* 'unconstitutional' about the Congress' actions.
This list lost all credibility for me when Assassins Creed was #9
And the people who voted against him legitimized his Presidency by playing the game.
Sure there is.  Go look at the legal minimums for ethanol quantity in our fuel. Sounded like a good idea.  Next thing you know, there's a food shortage crisis.
i'm no lawyer, but from reading that, it sounds like you should be committed to an additional year, if you don't give him 60 days, which is even worse bullshit than what you're describing.
I always liked "Savage Sam", myself. But Miggle Savage Kinda reminds me of a "Mirror-universe"  character of the creature from "Spaceballs", "Barf the Mawg". But instead of helpful, funny or kind, Savage is the diametric opposite.   Make that "MikeArf-the-Hate-filled Mawg."   And now Mikey's agents no doubt are marketing him to XM Or some other money maker for Hate and mistrust.  Ross was  right.  "It is," he said, "Just Sad."  And it is.
FOUND IT  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y7kqznBTc9o
A penny saved is a penny earned.
Yes, I call that security. The security is for the medical staff, NOT the patients. Try getting someone else's blood on you in a struggle and go through the scare of getting tested for HIV, and do it all for $10.00/hr, then come back and tell me if my lack of getting up in a patient's personal zone unless I absolutely have to is an unwarranted lack of compassion. Patients have accused guards of everything. Rape, theft of their belongings, molestation, you name it, and they have tried every trick in the book that they could, even faking injury to trick a curious guard into entering a room so they could attack them. You do NOT leave your post if you're on a patient watch. You do not enter a room with a patient without staff present. If a patient needs help, you radio it or shout down the hallway if you have to. If you break protocol not only could you lose your job and your license, but you might just end up in court because the company you work for is often too cheap to get adequate liablity insurance. The one I worked for relied strictly on tort law and often attempted to disclaim liability for any mistake guards made. If I wanted to save lives as a medical professional, that's would have been my chosen career. In fact the reason I quit doing it, which is really none of your business, is because I couldn't stand the idea of searching people (you feel like a creepy fuck having to search a suicidal woman for weapons while her husband is right there looking at you in disgust), holding them in the hospital against their will, feeling like I was prone to lawsuits and whatever new strain walked in the door, not to mention having to catch car thieves all the damn night with no tools to defend myself other than my own two hands. If you think you're gonna save lives doing that then feel free to apply and prepare to be disillusioned.
The Joker said it to Harvey Dent when he was in the hospital bed. 
When will the criminal charges be filed?  That video clearly shows a crime.
&gt; Dr. Ross can make a tone sound out of a speaker using nothing but an energy beam he sends out through his eyes. You know, sad to say, but he's got one up on MOST people vying for the Randi prize just for being able to come up with a single verifiably testable claim. Most of them can't even manage that.
I'm sorry, but if you'd like to comment I'm going to have to ask you to stand over here in the 'free speech zone'.
Yep, a lot of FUD (fear, uncertainty, and doubt). Unfortunately it works it works on your average American. 
Ford would never make something that interesting....it might pull sales away from the mustang.
Consider this statement: "Aliens ARE HERE!! They walk among US! They may be implanted into OUR various earth governments!!"  When was the last time you saw anything 8 to 9 nine feet tall walking among us?
Fool me once, shame on — shame on you. Fool me — you can't get fooled again -George Bush http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8Ux3DKxxFoM (there's your citation) EDIT For the FUCKING MORONS who don't get the reference, I am saying that Obama already misled his supporters on one issue. Who or what is to say he won't do the same on Iraq? The above quotation is proof that a liar should no longer be trusted until he does something to prove he should be, and it comes straight from the mouth of a person who did the same damn thing, ironic as it is. You don't need a citation for COMMON FUCKING SENSE, and if people [read: apologists] like ZebZ do, then there is no hope for this country. If you think this is only capitulation that will be made, you are just fooling yourself. Thank you
I saw it happen once while I worked for Best Buy and once when I worked for CompUSA.  In both cases, a woman over 50 was approached by one of our female sales staff, and she asked straight out to be helped by a male.  You have to wonder what a woman must think about herself if she's not willing to be helped by another woman.  Understandably it upset my two co-workers, and I tried to explain it away as generational thinking - these women were both raised in a world where there was mans work and womens work (to a large degree, not totally - I know).  Anyway, in both cases I explained to the customers that the women I worked with knew what they were doing. I made sure to keep my co-workers involved in the sale to show these customers that they did in fact know their stuff. I also gave both sales to my friends - no way I wanted to profit from that bullshit.  I was tempted in both cases to ask them "Don't you need your husband's permission to spend this much money?". Not worth getting my ass chewed though.
I clicked 'save' when I first saw it on the front page.  [Here you go campers, join the fun!](http://www.reddit.com/info/6nz1k/comments/c04ehte)
It says "This crude HTML translation"...
If McCain is a war-monger than so is everyone who supported our invasion of Iraq. That includes Hillary Clinton and many, many prominent liberals. If you look at McCain's record you'll see that he has rarely been a supporter of military interventions. Therefore he is not a war-monger.
Made multiple operators cry?  Makes me skeptical.
Those were not zombies in 28 days later...they were living just mindless.
Odd...Obama is now leading 64- 36...yet every state still has McCain in the lead.  Must be all those Europeans voting.
You won't find many anarchists who blindly accede to free-market exchange.
Hey -- *Gattaca* didn't have a totalitarian government.  On the plus side, Reddit sure does give me a lot of excuses to talk about *Gattaca*.
I don't watch TV regularly, but it's on when I'm at my friend's house.  The only one that sticks out in my mind is that Scientology commercial.  It's got that inspirational music and a pretty decent build up and then they lay it on you... SCIENTOLOGY!
The Gottis?
The NRA is anti-2nd amendment too. They, too, are for the 2nd amendment as a privilege, which is anti-2nd amendment. You do know what the difference between a right and a privilege is, don't you?
What's the point of serving emergency food kits? Are they selling them or serving them, as in giving them away? Is this supposed to be catering to the hurricane crowd? http://restaurantssacramento.blogspot.com/2008/01/sacramento-catering-company-youve-found.html It could also be interpreted as selling kits that feed 275 people in case of an emergency.  
Because that's how the gay men are. They can't even look at a female or ask a work related question.  Nope. This guy was in his 50's, fair skin tone---of some Islamic decent. He would ask any guy around the question he needed answered, as if I didn't exist and that guy was the guy with the answers. If I answered the question, it was like he was suddenly remembering the answer on his own or was  getting it from his spirit guide.
Who says the remaining 9% is undecided?
It seems anything that causes damage to mitochondria creates cancer.
Sorry to disappoint you but this Article seem to have been vandalized?  The German version of it tells a completely different (and more logical) story. The spanish version seem to have been translated from the english word by word. though...  nevermind i believe the germens.   but hey this is reddit. we had our fun.
&gt;There's nothing inherently GOOD about democracy.  Irrelevant to the point at hand.  In a Democracy, a complete lack of accountability in the election process is a symptom of a corrupted government.  Corruption leads to inefficiency and injustice and is hardly desirable in any form of government.
Just made my go-fast node perk up.   Smooth stuff, if it stays on the road at  speed.
&gt; Tell yourself at every step in the design process that someone has undoubtedly already thought of this and what can you do to really set it apart. In design, and particularly logo design, the pessimistic axiom that “everything has already been done” is becoming more and more true, and it is only the virtuous designer who can continue to stand out in a sea of sameness.  Is originality the ultimate goal of any logo?  The Sun logo is recognizeable; the Columbia logo is recognizeable.  The two companies aren't in the same market.  Are the respective logo designers incompetent or lazy?  I don't necessarily think so.
frenchfags? I'm confused how you would make such a hurtful association without context. What are you, a fagtexan? Huh? Not so funny now is it?   You do realize other countries call Americans names like that right? Wouldn't it be better to be the better person and NOT use random stupid demeaning terms like that?   PS it demans you not the French.
....no  Guessing you have though.
Okay, now I am confused.  After I voted, it said Obama was up, when I refresh it switches the two.
Up to 355 people are believed to have died in the [1948 marches](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_massacres_committed_during_the_1948_Arab-Israeli_war) from Lydda and Ramleh.  Numbers for the al-Aqsa Intifada are often quoted higher than your numbers.  Put all those horrible, unjust, wrongful deaths together and the word 'genocide' is still well out of reach.
Man.  This just goes to show you, them atheists are *sickos*.
Technically it's more of a Southern phenomenon then it is Midwestern.  For historical reasons geography and cultural demographics don't necessarily coincide in the US.  This is especially true of the South and the Midwest.  I mean, if you just looked at a map and figured that "The Midwest" meant the middle of the Western half of the country, you'd wind up thinking that Utah was a midwestern state, which it emphatically is not.  Same thing with New Mexico, Arizona and Southern California; they may be southern, *per se,* but they aren't "The South." Just sayin'.   
For the same reason the parents are, and if they're not, they should be.
I'm speechless...
Or getting porked.
That depends.  If you say that Islam is nonsense, then you shouldn't get modded down.  If on the other hand you say Islam is nonsense, much worse than this other religion, then you should get modded down.  You see, if you say that religion X is worse than religion Y, then what you really are saying is that religion Y is better than X. Which makes you a wackjob, as all religions are equally worthless.  Now *some* followers are more violent than others. But that is really a result of their environment. I suspect that Middle-Eastern arab christians are just as crazy as their muslim counterparts. This is because they don't have the moderating influence of atheism in their environment, at least not to the degree that the western world has.
uh wat? i read that an i saw was  major fail.
count me in!
How does one go about proving that consciousness itself exists? 
whale, there's not tuna much more one can say really  halibut we call it off
vim
And Hitler was [Catholic](http://www.liberalslikechrist.org/Catholic/Hitlersfaith.html).  Here comes the "He wasn't a *real* Catholic" posts...
I think he forgot the bunnies.
But...wait: No trans fat! It is therefore healthy!
Theoretically the legality of such an action depends on what state you live in.  Realistically you would go to jail or die regardless of if you were in the right or not.  If it wasn't being videotaped you would go to jail as they could prove you killed him and you can't prove you had a valid reason.  If you did manage to avoid prison you would be made an example of by the other officers on the force.
it's good work, if you can get it.
&gt;So I guess laws and regulations MISERABLY FAILED to protect people. Which is exactly my point. Clearly, ( from the example YOU provided,) there were laws and regulations hard at work - people had to actively circumvent the rules by altering the certificate of purity. Gee, I guess your theory isn't holding up very well, is it? No, if my theory wasn't holding up well, it would mean people IN THE USA died from the cough syrup.  They didn't. Instead, all the people who died were in countries with *lax* regulations, or none at all.  My theory is doing fine, thank you. The only thing you're arguing is that hypothetical regulations in unnamed other countries failed.  Which countries were those?  What regulations do they have?  Are the regulations actually enforced?  How corrupt are they? These are all questions which you are ignoring in your blind rush to find anything at all to attack me on.  After all, I did only claim that *properly enacted* regulations work.  Just putting a law onto paper, alone, does not make a well-enacted regulation.  And otherwise, given that it was Panamanians who died from the cough syrup but *not* Americans, it's a little hard to credibly argue that our regulations don't work out better for us than the system Panama has. Edit - PS, OSHA really doesn't have much to do with this.  These are two entirely different types of regulation.  None the less, that chart is practically meaningless.  Our economy has steadily been moving away from dangerous industrial work to safer white- and grey-collar work, so of course *overall* deaths would go down.  The REAL question, which that graph ignores, is what sort of impact OSHA had on dangerous professions specifically.
Leave her alone, she's 'armless.
Yeah, discharge a firearm on a crowded bus. Great idea, champ.
Well it'd be like us going to Japan I suppose, where their level of consumerism is even higher! My buddy went there and was AMAZED at the random stores they had. One was a candy sex toy shop. I mean WTF. 
This game and Little Big Planet are gonna keep me busy...
I'm a California Ron Paul supporter, and in my Congressional district, you're dead wrong. Our mission is to take over the Republican County Central Committee.
"the one person with a legitimate shot of saving our asses" You mean the assassinator of whomever becomes President? HA HA HA HA HA - now that's a knee slapper HO HO HO HO HO
yeah, we are cheap. $25 here too.
Two of my friends died because of this.
Yes, I have a few books from awhile back I'd like to get rid of - The Case for Christ and The Case for Faith, by Lee Strobel. I could put them up on this site but then again, I should probably just burn them! 
If his intent is to spark discussion and to find truth, why are many of his questions closed-ended (yes/no) questions?
Redditer reads comment about [Religion] assumes poster is [Religous] ignoring that [Christians] are in fact [persecuted victims] like in  http://www.christianpersecution.info/ and http://www.prisoneralert.com/ and people like [above poster] encourage lynchings and child rapes and burnings for people who are [Insert Religion].
Well that's depressing.
So instead of ONE federal agency that could monitor imports, we need FIFTY. Real bright there.
Ah, the days when he was still awesome.
Take him to court. He might renege.
It's a hardware problem.  Workarounds: reroute through Pemberton, helijet or water taxi from Squamish.
For one thing, if you have super speed you can fight on walls /upside down against other people with super speed.... You can also turn people into objects to throw at others... I see hope.
I think he was being sarcastic. You are right, however, that he's a self-aggrandizing blowhard.
Excellent point.  
Save the children!!  You know what else is child porn?  Children looking at their own bits... we should arrest all the children so they don't see themselves naked!
that's 40,000 in the US!
They said only 100,000 will be released with this technology. I'm going to buy as many as I find for the same reason you mentioned.
I see what you did there.
A revolutionary leap in technology could transform solar power from a marginal boutique energy source into the mainstream. It all has to do with storing energy when the sun isn't shining—an expensive pitfall until now.
I think you will find that whoever denied it supplied it.
But Brave New World didn't really have an oppressive totalitarian government. The government in that book was genuinely concerned with the welfare of its people, and mostly left them alone. It just found that discouraging intellectualism (still in a pretty benevolent way) was necessary to that goal.  Nineteen-Eighty-Four did draw heavily from *We*, though, which was written in 1921.
I'm spilling my brains for a good pun.
Compromise to get votes or just keep on fuckin' losing like a losing-ass losery loser type.
Okay - your response was kind of awesome. :D
Whoever this guy is, he's wanted for abduction. There's no way this guy has ever had sex. 
&gt;I gave examples of what is happening. How is that a false dilemma? They are two examples of dozens why war would continue regardless income tax. False dilemma is when you say there are only two choices. Example: "Government will either 1) or 2)". There are many more choices for government to make than that. &gt;It would be extremely naive to believe war would vanish even with the collapse of the United States. I'm not sure how it makes any sense to you that the collapse of the most militarily powerful, and civilly armed, country in the world would result in anything less than the most violent wars in human history. It is foolish to keep doing the same thing over and over thinking the results will be different. If people want to ruin their economy because they lack the sack to cut the purse strings, then they deserve everything they get. &gt;I'm not sure why you even said ad hominem. &gt;It seems to me you dislike income tax for whatever reason and are trying to rationalize it by relating to a popular topic. &lt;-- that's an ad hominem. Ad hominem does not merely relate to being insulting. It also means addressing someone's character rather than discussing the merit of the argument itself. If Hitler says "the sky is blue" that doesn't make it untrue just because Hitler said it or because he has some ulterior motive when dealing with the sky.
Here's the rule.  If you bash Mohammed for his pedophilia, you've gotta bash Moses and his followers also.   &gt; *Numbers 31:17-18* Now therefore kill every male among the little ones, and kill every woman that hath known man by lying with him. But all the women children, that have not known a man by lying with him, keep alive for yourselves.
Let me know how that works for you when the rolling blackouts come. 
Too bad the furniture produced by it looks like thinly extruded white poop.
Huh? Wait... did you just pass the [turing test](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turing_test)? Just kidding, I'm reading it now.
Don't forget the whipped cream and a cherry to top it off!
Damn, that's true. Every time I think I like the Libertarian party, someone jumps up to run for office claiming aliens are living in his ass.
&gt; cory doesn't know much.  That's the truth. He's the Jon Katz of science fiction.
Who Let Da Dawgz Ayote!?
Well, combine that with other miraculous breakthroughs like cars under development that some day soon will get over 30 mpg (highway) and we'll be able to fund the Gore/Rothschild Carbon Credit Brokerage Industry with change to spare!
Also check out goodreads.com
"If Tenant intends to vacate the Premises prior to the termination date fo this Lease" Is this true?  Are you vacating prior to the termination date of the lease?  If so, that's that.  You had to give 60 days written notice.   The only way you would be in the right is if you gave 60 days written notice on or after the termination date (assuming you can rent month by month after that).  If you planned on moving out on the termination date, you should have given notice 2 months prior to that date. Sorry, it's just what it says. Edit: Oh.  Another year... count your blessings. 
Hah, maybe we'll finally start seeing some of those NP problems getting solved a bit quicker. :-P
As a friend of mine eloquently put it,  &gt;looks like someone put a stick up their ass and coated whatever came out in pancake
So ... voting once every four years is the *only* thing you're willing to do about all the things you think need to be fixed?   The perspective I refer to comes out of the experience of many millions of Americans who commit to lifetime struggle at all levels. It does *not* concede that the Democratic and Republican parties are the only choices. It explicitly does *not* require working for or donating to Obama. In fact, a person working in pursuit of this strategy might well spend every minute *except when they're in the voting booth this year* doing everything possible to build a third electoral party. Or pushing for changes in the *structure* of federal elections like that would make it even possible for a third party to ever win one. Or even organizing a revolutionary movement.  None of those things is precluded by the call to maximize the potential to break the GOP drive to destroy the balance of powers and create an imperial presidency. But all of those other activities might well be precluded by the continued march toward outright fascism that a McCain victory would entail.   
That's racist.
comment deleted
Monosodium glutamate is one of the most dangerous substances in the world, because it will make just about any trash that fits in your mouth delicious and satisfying beyond anything the human race has historically thought of as food. You go and find one of these awful things and eat it, and I guarantee you will be very happy. They could stuff wasp larvae down the middle of the sausage and all they'd need to keep this thing tasty and wonderful is more MSG. And it's as natural as table salt, so that helps too. Ever wonder how something with "natural flavors" can taste so much better than any flavor you've found in nature? There's your answer.
you are easy to please.
Good catch, but in this day and age, $136M is chump change. And by this I mean, a class action lawsuit because of lead paint could easily top a $136M settlement.
Which makes it really odd that in so many mammals, they're fully exposed and very vulnerable.  Perhaps that's nature's way of making sure that only the fittest, the ones that can figure out how to protect those tender vittles, reproduce.
&gt; As far as 12-year-old wives, there's nothing in the bible about them at all.  yes, there is   &gt;*Numbers 31:17-18* [Moses said] Now therefore kill every male among the little ones, and kill every woman that hath known man by lying with him. But all the women children, that have not known a man by lying with him, keep alive for yourselves.
What are you talkin' about, buddy? It ain't racist if he really is a negro.
Oh you again.  Joy.  The child and his friends emerge.  Your statistic for prisoners is a good example of how atheists and religious zealots alike misconstrue religious identification statistics.  Those statistics come from asking each inmate what religion they are.  The typical response they get is the religion that inmates grew up with, unless you stupidly believe 99% of inmates are religious, completely out of line with the general population.  There is no indication whatsoever if any of those inmates have ever set foot in a church, or even if they have in the last ten years, if they believe in the respective dogma of that church, or even if they do, what part of it. If you asked more appropriate questions, I am sure you would find that at least a third of the inmates meet the criteria of being areligious and/or atheist.  Also, look at how many Scientologists there are.  If you believe that statistic, I've got a bridge to sell you.  I'm willing to bet a trillion dollars of your white boy trust fund.
&gt; No president has ever been elected from the Mountain Time Zone How can you argue with logic that airtight?
Basically they came up with a more efficient way of performing electrolysis.  I wish they would tell us how much more efficient it is and why, otherwise the story seems like complete hype.  
You don't seem to know what an infant is.
it's not a trick.....it's an *illusion*
Well come on, that's Star Trek for you. Or more accurately it's Branagh and what's his name. The two assholes who ruined Star Trek. They're racist as hell and it shows. When the second lieutenant on Enterprise turned out to be a grinning hick nigger, they immediately demoted him and made up some bullshit about how there can't be two people of the same rank on the bridge. Racist. As. Hell. Second only to George Lucas.
Thanks for the update, chief.
Damn, some of those are pretty good.
FUCK YEAH .. This image is as boring as the AS of U itself.
1. Help people swap books.  2.  3. Profit!   [edit: stupid markdown...]
Yes they do.
It is not as easy as you might think.  Someone first has to be convicted of a criminal offence that *falls within RICO*, and only then can a civil suit be launched under the law.   http://www.ricoact.com/ricoact/nutshell.asp  http://www.ricoact.com/  &gt;In 1970, Congress passed the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations (RICO) Act, Title 18, United States Code, Sections 1961-1968. At the time, Congress' goal was to eliminate the ill-affects of organized crime on the nation's economy. To put it bluntly, RICO was intended to destroy the Mafia.  &gt;Throughout the 1970's, RICO's intended purpose and its actual use ran parallel to each other. Seldom was RICO used outside of the context of the Mafia, and it is not an overstatement to say that civil claims under RICO were simply not brought.  &gt;In the 1980's, however, civil lawyers noticed section 1964(c) of the RICO Act, which allows civil claims to be brought by any person injured in their business or property by reason of a RICO violation. Any person who succeeded in establishing a civil RICO claim would automatically receive judgment in the amount of three times their actual damages and would be awarded their costs and attorneys' fees. The financial windfall available under RICO inspired the creativity of lawyers across the nation, and by the late 1980's, RICO was a (if not the most) commonly asserted claim in federal court. *Everyone was trying to depict civil claims, such as common law fraud, product defect, and breach of contract as criminal wrongdoing, which would in turn enable the filing of a civil RICO action.*  &gt;RICO's broad application was the result of Congress' inclusion of mail and wire fraud as two crimes upon which a RICO claim could be brought. Given the breadth of activities that had historically been criminally prosecuted under the mail and wire fraud statutes, it was not difficult for creative civil attorneys to depict practically any wrongdoing as mail or wire fraud.  &gt;During the 1990's, the federal courts, guided by the United States Supreme Court, engaged in a concerted effort to limit the scope of RICO in the civil context. **As a result of this effort, civil litigants must jump many hurdles and avoid many pitfalls before they can expect the financial windfall available under RICO, and RICO has become one of the most complicated and unpredictable areas of the law.**  &gt;Today, RICO is almost never applied to the Mafia. Instead, it is applied to individuals, businesses, political protest groups, and terrorist organizations.  So this is likely to be a bunch of BS, especially if they are bringing in all possible celebrity names as plaintiffs. 
Wow, 7-12 thousand more than I make. 
&gt;I can't wait till that generation dies off.  &gt;Cause I don't have a single peer who thinks pot should be illegal.  Problem is there are still powerful forces at work that will, as is common now, buy the votes needed to keep their cash cows in place.  Everything that is currently made with petroleum could be made from Hemp oil - do you realize the first car ever made ran on Hemp Oil?   If we could grow it freely again, it would kill the nylon and plastic industries (because the material costs for manufacturing would fall through the floor, vastly lowering the barrier of entry) have a massive impact on companies that sell chemical fertilizers to repair the damage done by year in year out planting crops of corn (since it would allow farmers to rotate their crops quicker and provide massive amounts of the nitrogen back into the soil), paper manufacturers would be against it since they are designed around the inferior tree pulp model and the multi-trillion dollar drug industry would kill to make sure you couldn't grow a weed in your backyard that works better than their synthetic bullshit.
Yeah he looks very good for a crusty emo stump, you vaginal avocado.
I don't want to ask what the women earn!
Oh wow, I liked XKCD too. But that one just ruined it for me. 
Coming back home from a 5 1/2 hour drive, I could have stopped at the gas station a few miles from home, but I didn't. And about 3-5 minutes before getting home, I shat a little. In my pants, in the car. Yay. 
He is a flaming moron; *deep breath* however, there are children (especially) who are diagnosed with diseases that are a symptom of bad parenting or environment. Maybe not 99% of autism cases; I suppose that's hyperbole on his part.  Autism is a condition that is hard to understand in its mildest forms, and even though there seems to be some sort of pathogenic/genetic basis for the serious cases, what is commonly referred to as "mild Autism" could also be the result of insufficient social interaction as a young child, for example.  So yeah, he's fucktard but he does have a point.
If it does reduce electricity usage as much as it sounds, then the idea will not be let out on the market for a while. A nice fat check from the oil warlords and the technology will vanish into obscurity.
Well said.  How perfectly conservative of you George.  Keep it up.
You may have a problem with it, but God's will doesn't always match our own. This lunatic may have faith in Jesus, but the bestowing of saving grace is a two step process: 1) faith 2) repentance of sin.
45%+44%+9%=98%, not 100%. 11% are undecided.
Because Python has dynamic typing and the existence of `eval()` and other dynamic programming features.  It's not that you can't write highly reliable software in python, it's that you cannot write _provably_ reliable software.  Generally speaking you do not want the control panel on your defibrillator/nuclear reactor/airliner/antilock brakes/warship to be even potentially susceptible to those classes of bugs that can be avoided. 
Let me return the favor: Old Man's war, Scalzi.   I liked it better than "Armor"
Nine Inch Nails - Head Like a Hole
Forget what ?? how your shitty government attacked you and you still do nothing .. FUCK YEAH !!
Wow, another Republican who smears their challenger at every opportunity whether it is true or not. Did you know that these tactics only work for so long? Your support of pathetic attack advertisements does a good job of showing your true personality. You are going down Mr. McCain.
This may sound silly, but for the benefit of Us who have never seen a white castle burger, just what are those ingredients? I think I see egg or cheese in there, and some meat-lookalike, but beyond that I'm unsure.
I read coil, but I can't read.
There's no words in it!
You people crack me up.  How far back do you want to go?  Maybe a couple hundred years?  Yeah, that seems natural enough...oh wait we still had irrigation.  Alright let's crank it back 30,000 years or so and wait for the next rain *the natural way!*  But hold on a second!  Who are we to manipulate **Mother Nature** by planting the seeds ourselves?  I say we roam around the countryside eating whatever edible fruits and vegetables we come across!  Just like Nature intended!!  The fact of the matter is that "nature" doesn't give a shit what you do or whether you live or die for that matter.  I bet you're one of those people that argues that pot couldn't possibly have any ill effects because "It comes from the Earth, man! It's totally natural!" Well guess what.  Poison mushrooms are natural too. And rattlesnakes and black widows and the Bubonic plague.  So why don't we quit crying over those Evil Scientists and start using our intelligence (which we evolved **naturally** btw) to fix the problem if there is one and develop food that is more resistant to disease and infestation and maybe even more suited to our needs than the originals ever were!  Just think of all the different kinds of new fruits we could make!  Or maybe I'm wrong and you're right and we'll all just end up like the dinosaurs and you can die happy because the earth will be "natural" again.
We have lots of "real cafe's", so why does Gloria Jeans survive?
Full article text, for those of us who do not have a subscription to Nature.com:  http://www.vetscite.org/publish/items/004380/index.html
I *could* post a link in reply to this, you know...
I don't know Johnny Quest Jones has a better ring to it.
Wow. I wonder what the reaction would be if a student joked about similar matters today.
Her husband is a big contractor with his chin dangling on the public trough, also.
TBS has been around forever and I have no idea how. What did we do to deserve that ad delivery tripe?
I thought it was just going to be: "Of course you can keep your motorcycle when we get married."  Yes, I'm talking about you Susan.
Me neither. Though over on http://nextbigfuture.com the guy is hawking a future filled with personal electric planes. You know, so you can commute farther. There's not enough suburban sprawl in the world.
STOP SHOUTING AT ME !!!
WALL-E?
haha read this guy's previous comments. he's a riot.
You and me both.
SORRY
He is basically saying that in the hypothetical event of finding illegal porn on the computer then instead of reporting it to the cops the alternative could be to trash the computer and say nothing could be retrieved.
Dude that's just harsh. No dad deserves that and there are a lot of very fucked up dads out there.
No. . it's from america. .. Only shit comes from there.
I'm not watching it because it's fucking boring.
&gt; The tragedy of Galois is that he could have contributed so much more to mathematics if he'd only spent more time on his marksmanship.  That line just killed me.  Especially considering that if he actually had spent more time on his marksmanship, or maybe just gotten a full night's sleep instead of staying up all night doing his homework, he might have turned out to be another Newton or Einstein.
More likely they'll begin requiring your name, address, social security number, and fingerprint before mailing something.
As an alternative, I suggest Banff.
"terroristic"  Fuck you, news media.
What's wrong with being a nerd? Did we return to the '80s?
CNN is a firm backer of Obama. It's bending over backwards at the moment to air black-sensitive documentaries. The network's highly partisan.
I never said it would be logical or anything.
Aside from support from the Hillsong group?  No idea.
Morgan Ladimore Smith really isn't that bad.
I think he wants to know how the scar is oriented on your face.
God you're a moron.  It's existence is like how there are still American farmers.  Are we an AGRICULTURAL SOCIETY?  DO WE HAVE AN AGRICULTURAL ECONOMIC BASE?  We have no more of a manufacturing base in the 80s than we have today.
I know it is fashionable to hate walmart, especially on "red"dit, but for someone like who grew up elsewhere, it is an amazing store. Most of you Americans are so pampered that you have no idea how good you have it.
Love books? What are you, a bookosexer or somethin'?
I think that he did mean SEALs, because the objection was that you can't have America's killing Americans.  But the article didn't even capitalize "seals": "Navy seals".  Then again, it's just the author's own transcription of someone talking, so he might not have written it as "SEALs" by accident.  Then again(!), maybe he did mean "seals" and also meant just some generic "American's" can't be killing American's
If you think project paperclip didn't streamline our ability to shatter the personality, control the mind and create triggerable Manchurian candidate'esque drones....think again  Five minutes, eight seconds in.  http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=6546125124638220966
this is dumb
I'd recommend trying out Review Board, actually linked from the google code review page. It's open-source, supports CVS, Subversion, Mercurial, Perforce, and more version control systems. It works pretty well and I'd take a serious look at it if you were looking for a mature code-review system.  http://www.review-board.org/
I actually first found time cube through crank.net - it even has it's own [category](http://www.crank.net/timecube.html).  It even includes a few [parodies](http://pasareppu.fateback.com/joke/gamecube.html).
I have not problem with the TSA in that they are just doing their jobs but I do think that someone in congress should consider what an enormous impediment to innovation and the free exchange of ideas they represent.  I'm working down here for a few months and I've put all my research work on hold until I go home because I don't want to risk detention over a breadboard.
Only because they *can* charge that. 
I read it as "ouched".
So not WoW but if it were something that middle schoolers would actually find cool I think it would be fine. I mean wouldn't you be jealous of Bruce Bateman &lt;Our last name&gt;
The average person does indeed. Evidences are open to anyone who cares to look. To be a scientist one needs no training other than the intuition of verification. Perhaps many "average" persons do understand that evolution is a name for a pattern whereas creationism is an absolute assertion intended to deceive.   Your brain fart isn't reasonable it feels like intellectual rape. Ideally, you should be imprisoned for spreading misinformation and your brain should be scrambled for the greater good of humanity. But I'd rather have you read some books or better yet go outside and observe.
Actually, rebirth is a psychological event (CG Jung). When someone does it right, ie actually repenting, they do become better people. To be fair, though, many people who give themselves up to God are those who are so sinful that they realize how off-track they are and want to change their lives. I was one of those people. We still sin, but we realize it's wrong and that our creator doesn't like it when we do so, so we try not to.
Really? I never knew that... very interesting. no wonder digg is so high (low level users) 
Well, I guess if the President says so it HAS to be true.
Indeed. I have lived in Japan for 4 year, and never heard of or seen such a thing. These may exist, but they are definitely not popular.  There are countries in Asia where it is normal to eat bugs, but Japan is not one of them.
I'm shocked that no one has mentioned Naked Lunch yet.
I'm sorry but you just don't get it.
HAVE NO FEAR, MUCHACHO - I couldn't stop bein' awesome if I *tried*.  **EDIT** AN' I AIN'T GONNA TRY!
Common sense would say you shouldn't have signed the lease if the terminology was not clear.  At this point it might boil down to your word against his.
Ofcourse they are. Have you seen a modern pig farm? I would think that pigs have intimate knowledge about the panoptican aspects of Foucault.
noted. Thank you.
Grandpa McSame is getting desperate.  And Obama doesn't roll over and submit the way John Kerry did.
Critical mass just seems to do more harm than good... Don't get me wrong, I am an avid cyclist- I bike far more than I drive.   Sharing the road is sharing the road.   Sucks for the fixie guy though, that looked like it hurt...
The foreign buyers are suckers - all assets in the USA are overpriced.
They ride around naked in a black van, smoking weed and fighting crime and watching last tango in paris. Pfft, sure they're eating it.
My first thought on reading this was "omfg people eat that?"  then I looked down at the bag of neon orange crunchits I was eating and thought.  "as you were"
My safe word is "Untiemedammit!"
That's why you have to quote people in your response when you suspect they may delete it on you.
It says Fern Ridge Lake right there on the map. :-)
And of course you can make better decisions for people than they can for themselves, comrade.
Right, e.g. the repeal of prohibition may have been primarily motivated by a desire to replinish the post-income-tax tax declines of the great depression, by again taxing alcohol.  Which would suggest that marijuana will most likely be legalized (and taxed) in a time of financial hardship and declining incomes.
Why are they entitled to his money when he hasn't taken anything from them?
i've seen those, too, and don't consider them *overtly sexist*.  i'm not sure if he's right about the results of the hypothetical "all men are bastards"-survey and the drawn conclusions.  all other links you provided are from one discussion:  is it sexist to generalize from the appalling character of her first gynecologist to all male gynecologists?  it's questionable if she did that, but to that he writes  &gt; And if you had simply said that you were more comfortable with a female gyno, then I wouldn't have said anything.  i don't think he wanted to say(or imply): &gt; Women should ignore the facts of patriarchy. &gt; Women trying to remove sources of patriarchal oppression in their lives is sexist.  but i really shouldn't be discussing on behalf of someone else at all.   thanks for linking though
That's not the point.  That's not even the argument.   The point/argument is that -- and this is explicitly stated -- respect (of freedom of speech) is a two-way street.
You forgot the best thing.  A gallon of coke, not a litre, a GALLON!  it aint patriotic otherwise.
I find on a daily basis they look like a number of different fruits. Coconuts first thing in the morning. Cantaloupe after my shower. Grapefruit during breakfast. Navel oranges during my commute. Peaches by lunchtime. Plums at dinner. Prunes by bedtime and raisins if I just can't get to sleep. 
I'll have to look out for that specifically, but I don't think I'm under-estimating it too much.  I've probably seen that movie at least 10 times, and the reason I watch it is for Gene Wilder.  His performance is top notch.  Every line that comes out of his mouth is witty and well-timed.
ahh gotcha. Its about a 1 inch long scar right next to my eyeball, running along my eye socket (Im pretty sure the gash was caused by the force of the knee against the edge of the bone forming the eye socket), with a smaller (about 1cm) scar horizontal and right above it.
Look at all the downvoted comments. The digg invasion is complete.   I'm sure I'm about to join them because that just wasn't funny. I'm all for making fun of typical World of Warcraft players but it's so smug and childish it resembles the exact type of person he's trying to make fun of. Even if intentional, not funny. 
Um... why would Price rule out three pointers?  He was a far better shooter than Jordan.
Ugh, I can't stand pancakes.  They spoiled a perfectly good chocolate coated sausage on a stick.
Before you agree or disagree with the judge, find out what the law is.  All too often, people blame judges for merely following the law.  Yes, sometimes bad judges make their own rules.  Good judges follow the law, regardless of who they would prefer would win.
I simply cannot stand to hear this worthless bitch talk - it has the same effect on me as oreilly and the rest of the fox idiots
why does this site always make it to the front page. Does anyone believe these stories?
not me.
"Hersh explained that, during the meeting in Cheney’s office, an idea was considered to dress up Navy Seals as Iranians, put them on fake Iranian speedboats, and shoot at them."
"In charge of Malaysia" is better.
100 grams = 3.5 ounces. That's a whole *mess* of pot! Enough for one person for weeks.  I think he chose 100 grams as an intentionally large amount so that no casual user would ever be accidentally caught just over the borderline into illegality.  In principle, I wholeheartedly agree with you. Baby steps though...
404 - each one of these numbers cost $83,000 a piece.
Funny. You are.
Too late, I call Rule 34.
*No one told George the title of his book was taken until it was too late.*  My Suffering -The Tale of a Misunderestimated President-
Not to mention you can get ill on 5, which is never a good way to start a relationship.
is www.twiddit.com taken? i want to vote up/down tweets.
Wal-Mart sells lower income people virtually the same crap for $1 that small business owners resorted to selling for $10 before Wal-Marts entered their scene, so that they could buy the same over-priced crap from middle-income business that also were selling crap that Wal-Mart sells for a buck now, for $10, so they could buy crap from the higher-income businesses who...hell, I can go on forever.   Look, if actions speak louder than words, then Wal-Mart is giving us- the professional consumer society- everything we have bitched and moaned for: the shit the people above us have; and now that we can afford that shit, we still bitch...   How about we discover cold-fusion instead or something? 
Then you don't get to blame it on terrorists that you've been following around to their various flight schools, Captain Douchebag.
You're probably wondering why you haven't been upvoted yet, huh. Well, let me just give you a little hint. That wasn't funny. I can tell you put some effort into that one, but sorry man, you win some you lose some. That one was a big loser.
No, that's the name of Gonzalez' book.
wtf.  it costs money?
&gt;there could arise information providers or corporate policies to market their toys as safer than their competitors?  This would be very difficult.  Suppose you go into business testing products for lead, and set up a subscription or ad-supported website to distribute this data.  I set up my own ad-supported website with fewer ads (or subscription site with a cheaper subscription, or just make a wiki), rip the data off your site, and your revenue drops to near zero.  The discovery of practical inventions is covered by patents, but the discovery of facts is not covered by any exclusive marketing privilege.  This is the very definition of a public good.  One could argue that a well-functioning court system can keep lead out of toys through liability, but the private sector will not go into the fact-finding business at the level a goods/services-type market would dictate.
Here on reddit alone, there are at least 80 people who liked this letter and, I guess, the well-crafted, rational  and calm line of argument. Some of these people might be inspired to reason and act similarly in such a discussion. This alone can be worth it. An open letter is not just meant for the recipient.
America, Fuck Yeah!  EDIT: Wait, what kind of nipples?
How do we know there was RAM in that slot to begin with? Seems like an unfounded accusation of theft.
weston price would've been proud. http://www.westonaprice.org/knowyourfats/
YOU CAN TELL JEANINE IS TELLING THE TRUTH BECAUSE SHE'S TALKING LOUDLY
At first I thought this was what bonked was trying to say.  
From what I hear, a lot of guys do a lot of things wrong.
you are so *cool* to mention that!
That does raise the question (it does not beg it, I don't think), should people avoid making realistic games about war? I don't care, but I /am/ too young to have ruined my body and/or mind in one.
Your ovaries told you to say that.
It's because the price of oil went up, more people are paying more attention, and there's more funding.  There is a lot of money to be made. 
Ah, how nice. You've read the first chapter of a Economics 101 book. If the world were only that simple.  I guess the world only needs selfish people with "personal incentives" to make it go 'round.  I'd love for you to share with us what references, reading or research has lead you to this black and white conclusion.
My point was that a disaster can spur a slow economy for psychological reasons, not logical ones. An idle person is more likely to be motivated by a hardship than spontaneity. Once working, he will probably continue to work. Logically he should work no matter what, but I know for a fact that in this world productivity is not as high as it could be. Productivity **increases** during hardship, and while that productivity is useless (fixing broken windows), it is likely to continue due to momentum.  While I don't 100% buy into my own argument, it is an example of a refutation of the fallacy argument.
It also makes women taller, and makes their butt stick out.  Or so I've been told.
The kid's mom is HOT
he got me too.
explanation:   http://www.419eater.com/html/kothapalli_rao2.htm
I agree. I'm extremely concerned that the dog and pony show is diverting young voters from learning about not just the structural barrier to third paries in national elections, and also from focusing on downticket races, but esp. that it's producing alienation and apathy.  In another reply [elsewhere in this thread](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6u7vw/her_teeth_were_knocked_in_nose_broken_corrosive/c04w3xe) I make the argument that voting is only one of many steps to change. But voting for Obama in this particular election is a bottomline necessity, if we want space to organize for something better after the election.   The way the false dichotomy insight (which is essentially true) is being used as an excuse for staying uninvolved is scary.   
McCain must have looked it up on Cuil.
Good movie.  I saw the 1944 version.
It has never matched our own.   He fails to manifest to tell us what to do.   Says we have free will to decide how to live, but one side results in everlasting hellfire of unimaginable pain.   Some 'free will' - Do what I say or else!   Kinda like having a rapist enter your home, and give you the 'free will' to decide if you want to live, but be his personal slave or forever be tortured in your own home.   Some loving God that is.  If he exists as the bible describes it, he is an asshole that I would never worship anyway.
some of those need explaining, because they arent even close to funny.  And one of them is more of a riddle than anything.
true enough - the irony is that I might more highly recommend one of her sisters.
So long as Engadget and Gizmodo readers don't find out about Reddit, we're good.
papers are a side issue that I can take care of, I am more interested in the substance of your work.
Are you kidding? Family guy is sophisticated, high comedy, and TBS messing with the greatest masterpiece of animation and comedy since warner brothers penned Bugs Bunny is blasphemous.  Actually I'm with you, family guy is low-brow, unoriginal trash catering to the simple minded.
Ok... so here's a scenario that might play out:  First, realize that Iran already has active breeder reactors busily churning out materials for bomb pro.. uh, I mean peaceful nuclear power plants for electricity generation only.  Keep in mind that Israel has a pretty responsible record when it comes to attacking non-fueled nuke plants to be (2 for 0 thus far). This time it's different.  There's going to be fallout and contamination.  How to deal?  Well, let's put something together that gives everyone what they want.  First, Israel strikes knocking out not only active reactors but uranium enrichment centrifuges running at 6000 rpm with pressurized uranium gas fueling the process.  Since some of that is under ground, they go ahead and use a small "bunker buster" nuke the US wants battle field tested.  Iran goes apeshit (of course) and pulls out a special payload they've set aside for exactly this occasion:  dirty bombs, lots of them (remember, they're not supposed to have nukes yet... maybe).  They load that payload up on a bunch of scud v5.3, aim at Telavi and let her rip (once they realize that nukes have been used against them and that they're about to be introduced to Stone Age v2.0, they fire off this parting shot before pursing an insurgent strategy for the impending US invasion).  Fortunately, anti-ballistic missile systems have been install both in Israel and in Iraq.  The beta stuff get tested in Iraq; the stable version gets tested in Israel... misses on the beta system are communicated to the stable system. The US puts up "The Eye of Sauron" 747 based laser anti-missile system on rotating 24/7 watch flights.   Pretty much every inbound is intercepted (another win for the US as it get yet another weapons system battlefield tested).  Unfortunately, there's fallout all over Iraq.  The stuff that the stable system gets falls out over western Iraq (no big deal), but the stuff shot down by the beta system contaminates the better part of central and eastern Iraq.  Fortunately, prevailing westerlies blow a much of it right back in the Iranian's faces, obscuring the fallout from air strikes on active nuclear facilities and the use of a real nuke on the harden targets... hence, "plausible deniability " is achieved.  The US gets an exit strategy for Iraq (get the fsck out of glowing dirt doge) and an entry strategy into Iran (UN mandate to go in an clean up the mess those naughty Israelis caused... &lt;wage finger at them&gt;).  The baseline that the troops are going to get irradiated in either Iran or Iraq is fairly irrelevant when you're trying to accomplish national foreign policy goals.  Oil shoots up to $300/barrel for 6 to 9 months allowing traders (who were promised a war with Iran much earlier) stuck in $200/barrel positions to exit gracefully and the Saudis/Russians to make a killing trading oil to the world.  Iran gets regime change and it's nuke program defanged .  Iraq no longer has to worry about the neighbor to their east just waiting for the US to leave.  The US gets and Iraq exit strategy and has several new key weapons systems battlefield tested.  Israel gets to remain the only nuclear power in the region and effectively cuts off hesbula at the knees; Syria, once again, becomes its own country.  Contamination blame gets firmly wrapped up in finger pointing between the US, Israel and the Iranians.  The region gets a new uncomfortable (but different) amalgam of alliance, focus and policy that lasts the next 10 to 15 years, extending the "GWOT", keeping the US MIC happy....  ...but most importantly: The straight of Hormuz stays open and the spice flows.   Wins all the way around. I think it's a solution that everyone can live with!
Soon it will be overrun with trolls, pranks, assholes, &amp; religious nuts. Thanks. 
you can catch the entire A Team episodes on hulu.com 
Heels aren't for walking, they're for fucking.  Duh.
Shut the fuck up, troll.
From Wikipedia:  *Capitalism in its narrowest sense is simply private ownership of capital. Capitalism, the economic system, is the system in which the means of production are owned by private persons, and operated for profit and where investments, distribution, income, production and pricing of goods and services are predominantly determined through the operation of a free market. Capitalism is usually considered to involve the right of individuals and corporations to trade, using money, in goods, services (including finance), labor and land. Ideally, capitalist systems are governed by the free price system set by the law of supply and demand rather than government regulation, though this does not exclude government defining and enforcing the basic rules of the market. Classic unrestrained capitalism is currently confined to theory, as "all of the capitalistic societies of the West have mixed economies that temper capitalism" with interventionist government regulation and social programs.*  Nothing about the bailout of Frannie or Freddie are incompatable with this.
What I'm looking for -  - Checks the RSS for a dozen or so podcasts at a scheduled time each night, and downloads any new episodes to my local computer. - Only keeps x number of shows per podcast, eg. at any given point, I only want 2 or 3 of the most recent episodes on my computer. - "Full" synchronization with my mp3 player.  When I sync, it will replace all of the existing podcasts with what is in the local download directory on my PC.  I'm looking for a one-click process where I can plug in my mp3 player at night, hit sync, and in the morning I'll have the latest 3 podcasts for each show on my mp3 player.  I've played around with the software that came with my Zen, and a few other catchers like jPodder, but none of them seem to be able to do everything - the scheduled RSS downloads, library management, and mp3 syncing.  Does anything like this exist, or are my expectations too high?  Thanks for any suggestions.
That's kind of exactly my point.
AMERICA!  Fuck-yeah!
I want a self-replicating store too!
*Recipe.* Take a large number of young men. Train them in the use of overpowering force. Put them in frightening, lonely situations far from home. Isolate them from all but a few women, and have them spend huge amounts of time with those few. Add a hierarchical culture and a gradual desensitization to terrible violence. Simmer 3 to 24 months or until terrible problems appear. Serves 500,000.
Didn't we evolve from bartering after they invented this little thing called money?   Aren't these points just an easy way for them to skim off the top without the customers realizing the monetary impact? You trade in a $60 book for 4 points and request a $60 book for 2 points. They end up with a net gain of $30 in book surplus which they trade for actual money. If that's not what they are doing, that's certainly what I should be doing.
No, I'm claiming that some of us are still able to shoot back. If you actually read Reddit, you couldn't have missed the stories of people who are shooting back at the SWAT teams who can't even get a simple street address correctly identified. We're not perfect in the U.S., but at least we're not a bunch of self-disarmed pussies, wringing our hands and crying in our beer while misquoting statistics to support our fascist fantasies of an all-powerful nanny state.
Fuck the Olympics.
pssst!  (1600 pennsylvania ave., d.c.)
I've noticed that there's two kinds of technical people: hackers, and people with degrees but don't really know how to hack. I guess you're the latter. 
good observation!
Then we're both happy.  What could be better?
Actually, here are the divorce rates among ever-married respondents in the General Social Survey (GSS, 2000-2004)—one of the best known sources of sociological data. "Frequent" is attending church about once a week or more:  58%, non-frequent Black Protestants; 54%, non-frequent Evangelicals; 51%, no religion (e.g., atheists &amp; agnostics); 48%, ALL NON-CHRISTIANS; 48%, non-frequent, other religions; 47%, frequent Black Protestants; 42%, non-frequent, mainline Protestants; 41%, ALL CHRISTIANS; 41%, non-frequent Catholics; 39%, Jews; 38%, frequent other religions; 34%, frequent Evangelicals; 32%, ALL FREQUENT CHRISTIANS; 32%, frequent mainline Protestants; 23%, frequent Catholics
Okay. Feel free to describe how someone drawing a check from an American company or as a head of an American company will be able to continue to do so without paying those taxes or living in another country...
The phrase “right out of” is not being used literally here.
I have it tattooed backwards across my chest.
You misspelled bastard.  Spell it "wanker".
400th, eh?
"This just in at FOX NEWS, Al Qaeda terrorists are increasingly utilizing cameras and video recorders to plan their attacks.  Here with us tonight, Security Analyst Winston Smith."
Or any Jesus jokes. Those are my favs.
&gt; It's not funny anymore. **Commented** for karma balance.  Fixed.
I know, I was real proud of that, but I wanted somebody to respond with the exact thing that the guy under me said, to kinda wrap the entire thing up in irony. The thing that made me sad was I think people were upmodding the actual comment for what it said, rather than getting the whole joke I was getting at.
Too bad he's a Scientologist.
If these photos are any indication, I'd say he had a heck of a life. 
If GOD existed, daughterfucker would KILL. CUBE is the ONLY answer, murder NOT. Not quite OPPOSITES.
What a grand idea. We wait until that happens. I'm sure that would work next time we need the CDC, too, or FEMA.
Just a copy and paste, friend. No harm intended.  Here, have some SODIUM LACTATE to calm you down a bit.
Scarcely.  Wal-Mart is already well-represented in all parts of the West that have enough population density to support it.  Those big blank spots you see?  Guess what?  They're either largely uninhabited desert or mountainous regions, or both.  For awhile lots of people figured that we'd eventually find a way to settle them, but reality is now coming home to roost and what with energy and water considerations, much of the west is going to stay sparsely populated whether Wal-Mart likes it or not.  
No really? What tipped you off? Maybe the word **oldest** in the title?
Heihachi Mishima, best known as "The Father of Painful Punches", mastered the ultimate punching technology during his research at Jumpkick University in 198x. He was a graduate student working in the field of Advanced Kinetic Knuckle Transfers under the direction of Dr. Oyabun Punchyu, head of JU's Department of Punching and Jabbing Science.   It was here that Mishima discovered revolutionary punching techniques that he later published in his famous paper, "Just keep hitting Square and Triangle: Whacka whacka whacka." The brilliant algorithms devised by Mishima led to further work by Dr's Bryan and Panda, including the Hit That Guy Maneuver and the Uppercut-Uppercut-Uppercut-Uppercut-Uppercut Uppercut. These advances in the punching sciences caused early opponents to get flipped over and run out of health meters like little babies.  Mishima has also made significant contributions to the world of Final Karate Fights of Supreme Awesome, giving livelihood to hundreds of ladies and dudes who kick really high.
As an atheist, I am offended by the submitter's headline.
I am in the Final Draft camp. I used to write a children's show on ABC and I loved using it for that. It's easy to customize templates for repeat  segments etc. I have also written screenplays with it and find that it lets me write without the program getting in the way. Screenwriting is a format heavy process and FD has the right features to let me format as I go without disturbing the flow of the ideas by having to think about formatting. 
FYI, CBC says the RCMP is releasing more information in a press conference tomorrow. &lt;/hijack&gt;
whats going on in these pics?
IE visits, eh? Perhaps the Digg squad are finally moving on from Reddit...
No special reason, but I doubt it matters.  Once the code is written to glue theora in, it will be probably easy to glue other codecs in also.
Yeah, this is bullshit, they are also brutal with the "bottom" ads that run during the show, theirs are among the worst and most intrusive.
That's not a sloth, it's a bush baby!
In your imagination, things can be however you want. Trying to answer the question "Is imaginary deity x the same as imaginary deity y" is an exercise in futility.
They aren't kidding... the man looks like he is having a stroke and losing the use of half his face! 
Wow. I thought it was a myth but the girl gets to come first.
I had it etched into my retina with a freakin' laser.
I'll probably vote for Obama so McCain does not take us to WW3, gas doesn't hit $8 a gallon, and our budget stays out of the trillion dollar range.   Fiscal conservative?  Please - today's Republicans are niether.
Yes, but it's the same as (*s++=*t++) without being fuckingly stupid "Perl Golf" C.
Please stop clicking.
So Paul wants to keep everything the way it is now and that means we will all die of lead poisoning?  Damn.  I wonder how society survived before this law.
This headline is pathetic even by reddit standards.
Nonsense.  That may be true in the *Army* which has pretty low standards or any segment that has had its meritocratic core destroyed through "multi-culturalization"  but it is not true for the preponderance of citizen-soldiers.   I would say that the average soldier has better mores than the average lawyer, clergyman, journalist or academician (four callings populated chockfull of predators, liars, cowards, perverts and cutthroats). Though, I will say that the unspoken doctrine of the Commissioned Officer Corps (or anyone staying long enough for retirement) is to lie, cheat, steal or do whatever you can get away with to advance your own career or help a fellow officer.   A commissioned officer is a perfect sociopath who will lie unblinkingly to anyone about anything if it advances him in the game.
Not a LOLcat more like a shiftless, lollygagcat.
Yes, exactly.
"A contract is a contract" is not the law anywhere in the US. For instance, if you have a contract with a painter who refuses to work, the courts will not force the painter himself to go out there and paint. Do you really want people to hide outrageous provisions in fine print?  Most people skip reading the fine print because they know stuff like "you must give us your first-born child" wouldn't be enforced if it was in there.
...and fascist.
Well that's not very fun at all.
versus fleeing in terror because the guy had a knife, letting an innocent fellow passenger get decapitated in front of your eyes?  guns aside, 2 or 3 reasonably able men ([or women](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=snuga2PGb00&amp;feature=related)) ought to have been able to restrain this guy, armed as he was only with a knife.  but i guess most of them, like you seem to be recommending, were happy enough to run shrieking from the bus and wait for the cops. guns are too scary for citizens to wield successfully/safely!  great idea, champ!
How is 1 ounce of gold worth 20 hours of my labor? Give me some flour, and I can feed my family. Give me a house, and I can sleep under it. Give me gold and I can... make a necklace for my wife?
If you had an insane country to your north wouldn't you spy on them?
3 is partially right I know some of the older nokia's from like the late 90's had that
So let me get this straight, as I earnestly want to understand his position, and maybe you can interpret it for me.  The federal government has already chosen the role to regulate foreign commerce, which makes sense because these are international retailers and product developers.  The concept of enforcing the states to regulate their own international commerce is unrealistic, because the product developers won't abide by 50 different jurisdictions, nor can each individual state handle such supervision.  Any laws involving contaminated products, food, toy, or otherwise, is hardly frivolous.  Civil litigation is ineffective when dealing with multi-billion dollar conglomerates, necessitating federal intervention.  All products should have to abide by an international code of standards, which is not enforceable, so it's up to the U.S. to form its own standards for imported goods.  Once those standards are implemented, watch the industry change accordingly to appeal to our consumer industry.  Look at England and their strict food policy.  However, the consumer has to be able to identify the ingredients of all goods to make an informed decision.  Without transparency implemented, then this has to be regulated somehow. However, based on Ron Paul's opinions, he wouldn't support product transparency either, as we should let corporations do whatever they want, and we mitigate the consequences when we are no longer oblivious or decide not to be victims of them.  Am I missing something? I guess what I'm asking is how can consumers be the responsible party in this equation?  
You know you can edit the labels? I have Vista (blech) on my computer for the rare occasions I need it, I also have it setup to read my ext partitions. Without thinking about it I labeled my root partition "U" (Ubuntu) and my home partition "N" (Nick). Now my drives are, C:U:N:. I should change my external harddrive's letter to T.
Then "Men aren't afraid of commitment" sealed the deal. 
I stopped at this quote: &gt;I am, after all the guy who, at 3:00 in the morning after the birth of our second daughter, decided that I needed to take a picture of the hospital bassinet (right) because the font for the baby's name, room number, and pediatric service was smaller than the bold text reading: "I'M A GIRL." Right, that's what should be in bold. Not, say, who the baby belongs to or its blood type.  Seriously, it was a form and "I'm a girl" was the only preprinted information on the card. What a whiner.   Actually I didn't stop there. I was fascinated by the writer rather than his message. There very well may be a problem with forcing children into gender roles, but that's no reason to get offended when someone wants to know whether a baby is a boy or a girl. There are 2 features that are meaningful, innocuous, and that every baby possesses: gender and age. If one of these offends you, conversations about your child are going to be brief and end with the phrase "what a prick" placed carefully under someone's breath. "Prick" can be replaced with "bitch" as fits the gender of the parent in question.
Please do. Heres some more info since reddit as the shitty 10 minute wait per comment rule:  Global warming consensus takes another battering. Paul Joseph Watson Prison Planet Wednesday, July 16, 2008  Three top scientists have once again contradicted the claim that a “consensus” exists about man-made global warming with research that indicates CO2 emissions actually cool the atmosphere, in addition to another peer-reviewed paper that documents how the IPCC overstated CO2’s effect on temperature by as much as 2000 per cent.  Professor George Chilingar and Leonid Khilyuk of the University of Southern California, and Oleg Sorokhtin of the Institute of Oceanology of the Russian Academy of Sciences have released a study that they claim completely contradicts the link between CO2 and global temperature increases.  “The writers investigated the effect of CO2 emission on the temperature of atmosphere. Computations based on the adiabatic theory of greenhouse effect show that increasing CO2 concentration in the atmosphere results in cooling rather than warming of the Earth’s atmosphere,” states the preamble to the paper. http://www.informaworld.com/smpp/content~content=a788582859~db=all   The full study, which appears in the Energy Sources journal, is sure to cause ire amongst climate cult adherants.  No global warming has been observed for the past 10 years http://www.propagandamatrix.com/articles/april2008/040408_cools_off.htm as temperatures have gradually declined and studies indicate that there will be no further warming for the next 10 years. http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-563104/Global-warming-stop-NATURALLY-years-say-scientists.html  In a related development, the peer-reviewed Physics and Society journal has published evidence proving that the UN IPCC’s 2007 climate summary “overstated CO2’s impact on temperature by 500-2000%.” http://scienceandpublicpolicy.org/press/proved_no_climate_crisis.html  According to the paper, “Computer models used by the UN’s climate panel (IPCC) were pre-programmed with overstated values for the three variables whose product is “climate sensitivity” (temperature increase in response to greenhouse-gas increase), resulting in a 500-2000% overstatement of CO2’s effect on temperature in the IPCC’s latest climate assessment report, published in 2007.”  The paper also outlines evidence to confirm that Mars, Jupiter, Neptune’s largest moon, and Pluto warmed at the same time as Earth warmed, a factor attributed to the Sun having been more active than at almost any other time in the past 11,400 years.  The paper concludes, “CO2 enrichment will add little more than 1 °F (0.6 °C) to global mean surface temperature by 2100.” Source: http://www.prisonplanet.com/two-peer-reviewed-scientific-papers-debunk-co2-myth.html
Who else thought about sex with the lamprey?
And where... is... the Batman? He's at HOME! Wwwwashing his tights!
Brisvegas woo. culture, with bewbs
[Germany: FUCK YEAH](http://gizmodo.com/350091/cheeseburger-in-a-can-is-both-the-best-and-worst-thing-ive-ever-seen)
Well really a soldier's job is to kill the enemy.  I guess we should actually be sending the NYPD to Iraq.
Get a smaller paintbrush :)
You crazy, bitch.
no way dude it's on you tube  thus it's true   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Euu_DMhsXQo
Surely it should be GFiltr.
this needs to happen more and more  as they erect more cctv, point your webcam out your window or something of the sort - let this be an equal match up 
That would make some DAMN fine eating!
Ejaculatory
